Dennis Hopper (Boiling Point)
Burritos and apple slices
1 packet instant vanilla pudding
3. Make sure your source is reputable and the prices align with the reputation. If you are spending over $700.00 for an original on paper, or over $2000.00 for a painting, do your homework on the reputation of your seller to make sure you are getting the value you are paying for. Having said that, I have picked up some really nice pieces of art at student art shows and sidewalk art shows, at bargain prices. But as a word of recommendation, don’t try to undercut the price the artist is asking… they are likely not making a great profit as it is.
He said they have become too sensitive that even words like ‘apek’ and ‘mamak’ – used in reference to the “elderly” in the Chinese and Tamil languages – can rub people up the wrong way.
There is plenty of credit to go around. The signing of Andrea Pirlo on a free transfer following his release by Milan will go down as one of the most brilliant pieces of business ever conducted by the club – and one of the Rossoneri’s most boneheaded. If the true picture is a little more nuanced, the player not having produced consistent performances of this calibre for some time before his departure from Milan, then his importance to Juventus is undeniable. His 13 assists lead the division.
He will, no doubt, once she leaves him,
Do you consider the effects of colour when choosing colours for your jewellery?
Malema said unemployment was the cause of recent political unrest, and nationalisation was the only way to solve it.
“We’ll share our temptations an’ milk wif you,
One of your lovely fears,
easy to catch, dreamily
He saw people were starving all over the place
In an article by Jarrett Stepman, written on 5/11/2012, Obama's former physician, Dr. David Scheiner, M.D. offers his insight into the man many deluded Americans voted for in the last presidential election. The entire article can be found at: http://www.humanevents.com/article.php?id=51433
The runner up is Economy Pens.
Hi everyone, today it's my turn to show you my creations. I just couldn't resist to make more than one card with these lovely images Crissy designed for Whimsy Stamps. ;) This month the theme is Animals and because I love horses since I was a little girl I wanted to play with these digi's. :))
The Lakers, with a new coach and aging bodies, seemed destined to be part of a larger story and sadly one that didn’t channel winning titles this year (do we feel collectively sorry?). At the beginning of this year they seriously struggled and the rumours floated about the possibility of them acquiring both Howard and Paul. Then they traded for Paul. Done. And not done. Odom was out too, then not, and he sulked and was offed to the champs as consolation for winning last year? Why now? No one knows. The media was having a field day, now “the Clippers are the better team” were words being said by many shouter-analysts. Gasol didn’t sulk. Maybe it’s a maturity with his Euro balling background and maybe he sees the nature of the game under different lights (maybe under a white hot surgical light?), but he slowly worked himself back into shape and form. “They are one point guard away” or “If Bynum wasn’t such a head-case” or “Kobe doing his best hero ball!!” were the chants from the fan-stands. Sessions was brought in to man the ship, finally, after quite a few more rumour-falls roared. The ship was self-correcting. Too much talent to get pissy over a Kobe (Kobe?) sitting and let’s throw a few Bynum benches in that fire too, burns nice.
Thus, in the Gnostic view, salvation from this diminished material realm of suffering and injustice depended less on one’s mere beliefs or on the following of religious laws that the Demiurge put in place, than on the individual’s inner experience of gnosis – a divine knowledge of the cosmic order and one’s true identity. The Gnostic scriptures alluded to Christ’s secret teachings, which would aid the Gnostic to embrace gnosis, and armed with this knowledge, to escape the illusory realm of the Demiurge at the time of death.
1 disarray
and several other local and regional ngos
Her daughter, like my youngest, loves animals, but our local shelter does not allow volunteers younger than 12, so her keen daughter, mine and other young potential volunteers aren't welcome. Both of my daughters, unusually knowledgeable about California mission history for their ages, signed up to serve as docents with La Purisima Mission in Lompoc, but we were just told volunteer docents must be 9 or older. The 7 year old would not be allowed to tag along, either. Since we travel in a pack, that means another volunteer effort shot down.
Yes, the famed moth catiplier. It turns into a beautiful butterfly and can be used to grip things too.
Putting aside paranoia for a moment, you may observe, if you are observant, that in this whole Guardian “editorial” there was no mention of our former Prime Minister or of Britain’s actions in Sierra Leone in 2000/1 . That omission despite the fact that it is generally accepted and understood that only after the Blair government & its armed forces managed to stop the limb-chopping rebels did the war come to an end. Few doubt that without Blair agreeing to General David Richards belief that he could extend his ‘rescue Brits mission’ to defeating the rebels and saving Sierra Leoneans, those Charles Taylor-funded rebels would have gone on to kill and maim many thousands more. Compare our press telling of this tale to that of the USA where they make movies such as “Blood Diamonds” and even claim credit when it isn’t truly theirs.
So both should losers be.
That was my personal testimony at a glance! My story is very similar to the stories I have heard throughout the years from other gay men; Swedish as well as immigrant boys from Middle East who were raised in religious families. We share the same fate, even if I was not born into a religious family.
Rachel J. Fenton is an English writer who paints and lives in Auckland. Her flash piece "Rogue Trading" was shortlisted for the Fish 2010 One-Page Prize, and links to more of her published work can be found at her blog: snowlikethought.blogspot.com. She is currently seeking representation for her novels.
We did a bit of barrel tasting, a couple of Chardonnay and some Pinot, and then adjourned to a rather smart tasting room. A caveat however, James may have a tasting caveau, but you do have to make an appointment first if you would like to come and taste – the number is 06 86 05 73 74 - as he does not welcome casual callers. But once you’ve made the appointment, you can be sure of a warm welcome.
Two such towns/areas of particular notoriety were The Black Wall Street in Tulsa, Oklahoma and Rosewood, Florida.
But before we dive into 2012... it's time for Xmas!
BONUS CD: Guided visualizations that will expedite your desires!
I'm not sure where to start with the massive amount of images from my recent trip to South America. It was such a spectacular adventure, full of comradery and laughs with new friends (wine writers are definitely people you want to have international escapades with!), wine education (I felt like I got a crash course from the world's top experts, lucky me!), stunning vineyards/landscapes, creative meals prepared for me with love and care (vegetarian power!) and a certain elegance pervading the streets of each city we were based in.
The Romney campaign, which had been angered by an Obama campaign ad featuring Bill Clinton and questioning whether Romney would have given the order to kill bin Laden, was cautious about taking Obama to task for the Afghan trip because of the tradition of refraining from political attacks when a president is abroad.
Wasting his life
1. weight control
But, knowing they are opening an office here in our area because God told them too and then told them to wait for an open door...and that door opened...and they said "yes" ...and they are here... unreal!
I felt like I was back in high school covering my text books with those manila colored book covers.
Once I had Elliott, I was completely taken aback by the number of mom blogs and forums and online debates about the best way to parent. I was utterly shocked by the militancy of some of these ladies, and their obsession with spewing their opinions in comments and posts all over cyberspace. I’m willing to bet that in real life parties and get-togethers, they might be too shy to say what they’re thinking out loud. But they’re thinking it, no doubt about that.
I got to school and got things set up for my day. I was starting my big projects with most of my classes. My eighth graders started researching for their music videos and my seventh graders were starting their research for their podcast projects. My sixth graders continued watching and discussing Season 9 of “American Idol”. On my prep-periods, I graded papers and watched “X-Men Evolutions” on Hulu and at lunch I watched last night’s episodes of “The Office”, “Parks and Recreation”, and “Community” on Hulu as well. I got done with my instructional day and it was time to get finished with school, so I left work and went right home.
The first part of the sentence in Romans 6:23 says “For the wages of sin is death….”. It is, in effect saying that mankind has, and will, receive the wages for our sin and those wages are death. This will come on judgement day. So to sum up:
-When I daydream, my mind goes to ___________.
My talk of grief gives people the wrong impression. I’m not sure that what I am feeling right now is strictly grief, at least not the way most people think of grief. But it’s not “not grief” either since I do still have upsurges of tears and sadness and loneliness. Most of the time I’m just . . . me. In fact, since I stopped watching the movies and television shows he taped for us, which caused horrendous upsurges in grief since we’d always watched the tapes together, I’ve been in sort of a limbo. Until we find another word than grief for the long-term effects of having lost someone important in our lives, I will continue to use the word “grief,” because whatever I do, whatever I feel is part of my grief journey.
Emails and phone calls that aren’t answered promptly will probably never be answered at all.
Other than the movie, I have no additional plans for the day. It's cold and snowing right now, so perhaps I'll have a little nap. Naps are good.
By far the finest book ever written about the American comics industry, Jones's history is a relentlessly compelling and yet heartbreaking tale describing both the dreams which inspired the creators of the very first superheroes and the unmediated avarice of the gangsters and fellow travellers who fleeced them of their creations. For the purpose of this imaginary care package of super-books for the disinterested consumer, Men Of Tomorrow explains not just where the superhero comic came from, but also how intimately its development has been determined by the very anti-social values which the costumed crimefighter has always been designed to fictionally oppose. There is of course the possibility that anybody who's read Jones's work might swear off the very idea of ever reading a superhero tale, given how convincingly he establishes the despicable heartlessness which has so often characterised the management of the comics industry. Yet Men Of Tomorrow also captures the sense of wonder and irony-free moral conviction which so often suffused the sub-genre's products, and in that, it's a book which discusses the historical importance and cultural vitality of the superhero in its infancy as no other ever has. Not just a history of geeks and gangsters, but a vital investigation into how intimately the propagation of the Republic's values have repeatedly been tied up with the self-interest of the Republic's enemies.
Professor Merges looks at several industry metrics and reaches the following conclusions:
My mother loved science and science fiction, too. She loved thinking about space travel and warp speed and beneficent beings from other planets. I remember when we were kids and were still able to see stars and the Milky Way from our suburban Kansas City backyard, she would have us lie on the grass, gaze at the sky. She would talk about the movements of the planets, how fast the earth spins and twirls around the sun, about how many years it takes the light of distant stars to reach us. Her voice was sure and steady and she would go on and on while we kids lay there totally transfixed by the beauty above us, lulled by the sound of her voice. She took us on many a trance journey to outer space. Carl Sagan himself could not have done a better job! There were times when I found myself holding tight to the grass, as if I might suddenly fly off, onwards and upwards to the stars.
Providence Journal (RI)
I was thouroughly pissed about some things like the pacing of the movie and the directors inabillity to do a good job by presenting the scenes with any impact. In the start when the alienjesus learns about earth and tries to fit in could have been done so much better and so much funnier. Later on when the script takes a turn down the road of rape and prostitution the movie is still delivered in the same mood as it was in the beggining. This makes the whole movie a bit awkward and a bit skitzo.
The final question is what criminal proceedings against Mr Coulson, in particular, would mean for the Prime Minister, Mr Cameron? But that is a question to be answered another day.
Liguria is one of the smallest regions of Italy, a narrow strip of land, whose landscape precludes extensive crop field. The Southern exposure, however, along with a mild climate favor an intensive production of vegetables, herbs, fruit, olives and grapes.
Wayne Shorter: 76 years old, Weather Report broke up in 1986. Shorter is still highly regarded as a saxophonist and has been playing in a more traditional jazz style for years.
Spellbinders " LACEY CIRCLES" nesting dies- 20.00 BRAND NEW
But rescuing the emperor is not enough. Ichiro soon realizes the only way to save the universe is to reach the Bridge of Heaven, located on the island of Hokkaido, the home of the barbarian Ainu. Only then can he hope to bring the sacred sword, the sacred mirror, and the sacred jewel together to restore the Emperor’s power and divine status. Assuming, of course, that he can defeat Taira’s naval forces and somehow close the demonic gateway through which the forces of chaos might escape to overwhelm everything. That, however, will require Ichiro to enter Yomi, the very domain of Death itself…
3. Brand Name / Market Presence:
Team Cee Lo performed ‘Dancing in the Streets’, in what will go down in history as the best team performance on The Voice (so far…).
Her Son lived out her song in His life and ministry. He died to set things right, not only between God and man but between man and man. He is returning to complete the task and reign as King. He has left us with His message and His task till He returns.
Stretch a Twilight Zone episode to feature length.
to accompany Pilooski's storming edit.
I don't work for a Fortune 500 company but I can damned sure bet you that my health benefits are going to go out the window when our contract is up.
Next time you find yourself at the Contemporary Resort in Walt Disney World be sure to check out this amazing restaurant!
This next ice cream recipe was absolutely sublime. This concluded another outdoor deck party that I hosted this summer. YUMM-O!
Fission and Transmutation 1.2
For lunch, we ate at a place called The Ruins. It's an all-you-can-eat buffet of Jamaican and Chinese food that sits on a natural waterfall. The food was so delicious! It was storming when we got there so we had to wait it out before we could go to the falls.
Tom Burnett Senior
Within a couple of weeks of that Nevada SCBWI conference, I accepted Michael Bourret’s offer of representation.
Rattus: I think I'll go lie down for a minute.
A tsunami-like wave, caused by torrential rains that inundated the Little Missouri River to about 7 meters (20 feet), drowned the victims as they slept in their tents at the Albert Pike campground in the Ouachita Mountains west of Little Rock, according to reports.
1 patents
I picked up these papers recently (must check who they are by!!) - i thought they were lovely and "fresh", i added a few Prima flowers, heart button by Little Yellow Bicycle and Making Memories ribbon.
We enjoyed the tart also; the strong taste of the cranberry filling stood up nicely to the sturdy nut crust. All in all, this recipe was a winner, one that I wouldn't mind seeing on the Thanksgiving dessert buffet.
Note about the coconut: The original recipe calls for desiccated coconut, which I think is unsweetened, but we can never find it and have always used sweetened angel flake coconut.
Last night, those cowboys found out just who was the best... a cowgirl! Yep, don't ever let those fellas be thinkin' they've got one up on a gal, especially a farm-grown, country gal with a gun in her hand.
It’s one thing to be greedy. It’s another thing altogether to be wise. Jesus was and is wise! Wisdom is better than riches and wisdom is justified of her children. True prosperity will sit down with them and offer something more; something real.
Well I don’t know if you remember me or not
I know what I want, but I can't get what I want. :-(
With titles such as ‘All I Want Is U’ and ‘In Love’ its easy to see how inspired W!LD is by the power of emotions and female forces in his life. This can be felt in every moment of ‘Dirty’ along with a deep nostalgia capturing a long lost energy of underground dance music in its current.
I stop and teasingly walk away indicating that is all you are going to get from me today.
Additional Vegan Sides: Sweet Potato Fries $2.79, Onion Rings $3.49
Offspring: Come Out and Play
a tie and then, good-bye,
The Sweet Hereafter (Atom Egoyan)
Monthly traffic averages a little over 2,000 unique visitors, with about 88% of them being NEW visitors. Thank you, Google Search. You are a strange friend.
Me: Where do I being! He PEED DOWN OUR VENT! GROSS.
Back to the class, though, we had two instructors, each casewokers for the two areas (each inclusive of several counties) in our region. One of the caseworkers we felt a great connectin with immediately; the other not so much. Unfortunately, the one we connected with is not our caseworker. However, we will work through this as well. I'm sure as we get to know our caseworker better, we'll feel more connected with her.
The European example should give us great pause on this side of the Atlantic. It is perhaps the clearest illustration that beyond a certain level of energy consumption, the quality of life rises almost imperceptibly or not at all. In fact, high energy use may even be correlated to a lower quality of life in the United States where obesity and diabetes have become epidemics (in part because we drive too much instead of walking or bicycling); where sprawled out suburban development made possible by cheap fuel condemns many of us to spend hours in the car each day; where the availability of that cheap fuel encourages motorized recreation that keeps our lakes and parks abuzz with engine noise while it degrades and pollutes them; where cheap consumer goods are often characterized by their low quality; where mountains of those shoddy goods clog our landfills; and where all the required extra energy production creates additional pollution at our mines, power plants and factories.
Here are the myths and lesson they feel they have learnt from their adventures.
A 2005 study by Yale University law professor Paul Gewirtz and Yale Law School graduate Chad Golder showed that among Supreme Court justices at that time, those most frequently labeled “conservative” were among the most frequent practitioners of at least one brand of judicial activism — the tendency to strike down statutes passed by Congress. Those most frequently labeled “liberal” were the least likely to strike down statutes passed by Congress.
On my 18th birthday, I received my first guitar. This changed me from being cool to super-cool. At least I thought it did and seeing as I couldn’t play, it done the exact opposite. Nobody wants a poser, they want some tunes. Imagine bringing a sexy, young quirky girl home and she sees your guitar. You know her expectations and performance for the rest of the evening is going to be based on how well you play. In my case, I initially came up with the excuse – “My heart was broken and can never pick it up until I find love again.” It worked every time. Before I could offer her a drink, she would be undoing my middle button.
So that is where I am at. For the moment.
The purchase of the painting did cause some controvery. Questions were asked in "the House".
The packaging alone made me want to buy it , but I've learned my lesson. Too many bottles have gone wasted because some scents give me headaches. So now, I always get a sample if available, and give the scent a proper test drive. Well, it's been almost a week and I keep reaching for the sample! I think we have a winner! I love that Twirl is a little sweet (not in a juvenile way), with a bit of sophistication.
Did you know that on blogger, we own NOTHING! They can shut us down tonight.
So, I must have kept them from some harmful material that might have damaged their tender psyches.
“Don’t. Let’s have a glass of wine and talk about Halloween. Any plans for your costume this year?”
People are so quick to judge someone who chooses a consensually non-monagamous lifestyle, but the operative word there is *consensual.* Everybody knows. Everyone is respected. Everybody is okay and secure and cared for. Everybody is safe in the honesty. In the know.
Some time later I received some money and instead of using it for something "sensible" I decided to go and feed my spirit.
Note to South Carolina special teams: don’t even think about kicking line drives this week.
Keep your tee height consistent, and you will be able to drive the ball more consistently. If you tee too low, you run the risk of grounders, but if you tee too high, you may pop the ball in the air and lose distance. Practice varying your tee height on the practice range, and find the perfect level that allows you consistent distance with your drives.
It is at the bottom of this email, and truly cringe-a-riffic.
I will of course post an update of the event afterwards on my blog, but if you are in the area and would like to hear yours truly blab on and on then RSVP to events@kravet.com
The hardback is beautifully packaged with a gloriously tactile cover, featuring terrific and evocative art. The production values between the covers match that on the outside. ‘Osama’ is a novel that defies expectations. A peculiar between-worlds narrative, detailing notorious acts of terrorism investigated by a classic noir gumshoe, it’s a mix that could have been an unholy mess. Instead, it’s a compelling mystery with a handle on the state of the world. Highly recommended.
O but hang on capitalism produces more stuff than people can buy buy buy
1827: 3%
We are now getting close to the end of the project. Come the end of February we are going to have to do a huge presentation in front of the school and potential employers of what we did. Here's the thing, we are not the only team presenting. I guess that it kind of obvious, but still. Senior Project itself is still a class that we have to physically attend once a week. Rather than learning anything we go there to report our progress of what we have done each week and the mentor (professor of the "class") offers us suggestions and feedback of how we are doing. We are in the class with three other teams. One is a team of network majors, the other teams are programming teams. For their projects, they are respectively building the same program that I was tasked with. The difference between our work is that that will be the major component of their projects in comparison to our team where the Java program is really the main focus of the project. Their programs also have a much larger scale of functionality in comparison to mine as well.
The castle has been picked over now, and we have carrots and celery in the fridge, all cut up and ready for crunching!
I’m sure you didn’t want this post to become a book in itself so I’ll add just one last piece of advice: Tell Book Bloggers how much you LOVE them! I have a whole page dedicated to favorite book bloggers on my blog and I tweet at least once a week asking friends to follow them. They are the unsung
Jazz is king,
48. Y'all Come (x)
CD: What is the first thing you do when you get up?
Fill a separate pot half way full with water and set to boil. Add sea salt, and some ACV. Give it a whirl to make a whirlpool and crack in your eggs. Remember to crack your eggs on the flat of the table and not the edge of anything. Allow eggs to cook for 3-5 mins depending on how soft you like your yolks.
Similarly, the church of San Francisco in Santiago in Chile had been regularly quake damaged and restored since construction began on an elaborate replacement of an earlier church in 1558. But a particularly severe quake caused great destruction on March 3, 1985. It was restored again and now houses a museum as well as being a place of worship – and a UNESCO World Heritage Site.
3. The Hurt Locker
I pondered for a minute whether or not I should try to get out of bed in the pitch black darkness to find the mosquito repellent. I would certainly expose myself to more mosquitos if I left the comfort of our net. But if I didn’t, I would surely get bit by the one flying around inside the net. Oh where’s my headlamp when I need it.
The main Tok’ra base of operations comes under attack by Anubis’ forces. They have to evacuate to the off world base set up by SGC. The Jaffa have set up camp there as well, and are not too thrilled to see Tok’ra coming. The feeling is mutual. The Tok’ra have nearly been wiped out by armies of Jaffa loyal to Anubis. Who can blame them for being jumpy? Jack is in charge of keeping the peace. It is a difficult task for him because the memory of his recent betrayal by the Tok’ra he blended with to cure the ancient plague still burns.--and he did not much like the Tok’ra in the first place.
* Entries Must be greater than 5% ABV. Our license does not allow us to make weak beer.
Finally after 17 minutes and now with one other customer in the bank, the money looks like it may be forthcoming. The teller shouts out through the bullet proof glass to someone in the back to bring him bank notes. They only have small denominations it turns out and finally these appear in a locked steel box. Checked and rechecked below the counter, the teller finally pushes a pile of notes across to me. No, I say, I wish you to count the notes to me. "What?" he says. I repeat my request and he rolls his eyes and with an audible sigh, the bank notes are counted to me. 26 minutes later and again the only person in this very well known international bank, I leave.
Again, I am very, very sorry for any problems this may have caused.
Our defence has two facets, neither of which I fear will have much impact :
like a storm in the desert,
758***II/2/1978. “On Matthew Arnold’s Dover Beach.” Arts Week, University High School, The Laboratory Schools, The University of Chicago, Chicago, Illinois. Dedicated to the memory of Hans W. Mattick (1920-1978). (Incorporated in Item B-3, above, pp. 150-65, 436-42 (1983).)
When ready to use, preheat oven to 350°F / 180°C. Prick bottom of the pie with a fork and cover with foil and pie weights. Bake until crust looks "dry", about 35 to 40 minutes.
It's the sort of movie where lonely, miserable people go around being lonely and miserable all the time. As a result, it'll probably make you feel lonely and miserable too. Unless you own shares in a duct tape company. It's basically one long advertisement for duct tape.
3. Madlib + Guilty Simpson - Blow the Horns on 'Em
I published weekly meal plans for the majority of the year which really helped our family nutrition. I am diving more into healthy meals this year - still room to improve!
‘While he is not here anymore
It is my goal to always be casting something – either a heal or a Lightning Bolt or dropping an Elemental – but I aim for 95%+ activity time on raid bosses. Sometimes (not sure how) but I break 100%.
"I stopped eating. I told my girlfriend, 'I think this is a head,'" he said.
Please follow our rules to be eligible for one of the awesome prizes provided by our generous sponsors:
I still haven't managed to get through the large pile of pallet wood I have, but I have managed to use a bit more making a play kitchen for the garden, it's pretty simple design wise but it will last and will take being played with vigorously (hopefully)
All three ladies were childhood friends and all came from musical families.
Before long a blind man appeared at the door guided by men on either side. ‘Hosanna to the Son of David,’ they called as they entered. Jesus looked up; he seemed in good spirits. As the new arrivals neared, he said, ‘Friends, what brings you here?’ The children had gathered, anticipating some wonder of healing to be seen. And as the blind received his sight, and lifted his arms heavenward, they began to jump, and run, and call, ‘Hosanna to the Son of David! Hosanna to the Son of David!’, the new passphrase of the temple. And among the upturned chairs and the coins lying ungathered, all was as it should be.
Glocke
Ithaca Beer
Concentrating on Cybele risks perpetuating the hackneyed (and surely deeply sexist) equation of Woman with Nature, the chthonian and the primitive. "Mother cults," wrote Camille Paglia, "did not mean social freedom for women" because "nature's burden falls more heavily on one sex," a fact to which honouring the female-ruled mysteries of life and death can only draw attention. I don't agree with Paglia that civilisation was invented by men as a defence against the oppressiveness of female nature. But goddesses like Cybele do embody a set of misogynistic assumptions; at the very least they represent a male way of thinking about, and failing to come to terms with, the Otherness of women. There's nothing whatever "feminist" about them and little that modern women should be wanting to "reclaim".
I thought the coolest thing about the harbor tour was this oil rig, which had been brought in for repairs. Can you imagine living on one of those for months at a time?! The wellhead is similar to the one that blew in last year's BP Oil Spill.
On the final day of 2009 we could still see grass (a rarity for Western New York!). That changed on January 1st when the New Year brought us what will here-on-out be called "The Never Ending Snowstorm".
A) 1 year
As suggested, there is no way to seal the borders of territorial states. Neither pure noninterventionism nor insulated self-determination are ever possible given the porousness of borders and the interventionary incentives of a range of outsiders. There are various low profile ‘interventions’ taking place. Weapons are being supplied, perhaps, special forces are covertly present as advisors or even fighters. In this respect, the most that can be done is to oppose gross forms of overt governmental intervention, as well as limit assistance to governments, including the Tripoli regime, that violate the fundamental human rights of their own people. In this respect, sanctions are appropriate if authorized by the UN so long as not coupled with intervention, and take responsible account of competing moral, legal, and political claims.
“Come on, Clay,” Whizzer said. “School ain’t all about the classroom.”
The driver noticed our imminent doom and braked to a stop, blaring his horn. The moose jerked and froze. He tossed his head and snorted angrily. The driver kept honking the horn, in short hard bursts. Dan and I hadn’t stopped running and we were finally outdistancing the moose. We made it onto the road and the minivan door opened. I didn’t even pause for a second before I hurled myself inside. Refuge was my only thought, not that I had just climbed into some stranger’s van. Believe me, at that moment, choosing between irate moose and strange car was not really a choice at all. It was an instinctive, gut reaction. “HIDE!!!!” My mind was screaming at me and so I did in the nearest enclosed space.
I have a few ways I enjoy spreading the word about Natural Parenting.
Let’s start with the cocktail. It’s only proper.
“Linden. If they could do that to Mr. Sanders, they could do it to any of the tutors if they thought they had a good reason.”
In the two years I lived in Asia, I was offered all kinds of extraordinary opportunities with celebrity figures, business ventures, privileged information, and so on. This is often the case for English speakers abroad, because generally more elite figures have easier access to foreigners for a number of reasons. However, I believe that “talking and thinking big” are far more common there now, whereas the mentality in North America is to lay low. As a major generalization, Europeans are looking to have a normal balance in life and not expect anything too spectacular or awful.
Aging sucks because I have vivid recall of events that took place 40 years ago, but I can’t remember where I put down my reading glasses 40 seconds ago.
The vehicle was thoroughly searched in my presence by our anti-bomb disposal experts and nothing incriminating was recovered. In essence, neither weapon nor explosives were found in it. Investigation into the case has commenced.
"We have to stand together to fight crime in our beautiful country.
Casper Van Dien ... Ash
Well, I am a Liberal and, in the immortal words of Clarence “Frogman” Wilcock, I am against This Sort Of Thing. I expect you are against This Sort Of Thing too. And the best way for us to fight This Sort Of Thing is to sing ‘The Land,” “Jerusalem” and “Lloyd George Knew My Father” as loudly as possible.
“So every necessary arrangement has been made successfully with the Agent deparker of the Consignment Box and every Documents guiding your delivery is well updated so you are advice to reconfirm your full delivery information to the Agent right now as he is currently at Orlando International Airport Florida with your Consignment Box, as he called me this morning to inform me that he misplaced your delivery address which he has due to CUSTOMS /FBI/ CIA and POLICE searching and scanning on the Box as if he is a terrorist there in your country but finally I thank God that they have confirmed that his movement is clear and genue with out any suspicious intentions to your country only to deliver this Consignment Box to you and the documents are updated as I earlier told you.”
8 day
That’s what I’ve been doing ever since 2008, and my life has never been the same. For the first time in my life, as a published writer, I can say I’m walking in my calling, my design, my destiny.
historian looking at it all and asking: how on Earth was such a man
The mirror of your dreams...
Removal of failed.
Mati: Every cat passes through Fiåney as they close their eyes and sink from wakefulness - it is the passage that weaves between dreams. As a Tygrine, I have the ability to enter the spirit world at a time of my choosing, though learning how to do this took me some time. I must empty my mind of my worries and enter a trance. It sometimes helps to repeat a chant. I have become quite good at entering Fiåney. It is escaping that is proving more difficult...
Unfortunately, the White Hats and Dragons have been comnpromised by moles and double agents taking orders from the reptilian cabal.
“I thought they weren’t…”
we couldn't resist planning lots of Alice posts.
That was it! And you arise, for you are
Birth and childhood – Poseidon was a son of Cronus and Rhea. Like his brothers and sisters save Zeus, Poseidon was swallowed by his father. He was regurgitated only after Zeus forced Cronus to vomit up the infants he had eaten. Zeus and his brothers and sisters, along with the Hecatonchires, Gigantes and Cyclopes overthrew Cronus and the other Titans. According to other variants, Poseidon was raised by the Telchinesn Rhodes, just as Zeus was raised by the Korybantes on Crete.
Author sources vintage shoes from various designers, including Vivienne Westwood for Melissa, Ted Baker and many more, as well as designing a limited range of shoes in house. I loved the collections on show, so much that I left with a pair of Melissa black patent, tribal patterned wedges.
The veg route:
What were Marie-Antoinette's favorite foods? She was not constantly gorging herself on sweets as depicted in some films. On the contrary, she was quite abstemious and enjoyed good, plain food, as Anna describes in a post. To quote:
To find what you are looking for, use the table of contents as a reference, and search the page (ctrl+f usually summons this on most browsers) for what you are looking for. Just copy and paste the line from the contents to find it.
The guy I was seeing was an idiot though. And as I became closer to my friend, started hanging out with her more, and therefore kept meeting the tall, cheeky guy that liked her too, me and him became friends. We lived near each other, so he'd walk me home after a night out, and he'd tell me the guy I was with didn't deserve me. That I deserved better.
Growing up, I was the girl who didn’t have a car. Walking and biking were my transportation. I loved it; I would actually wake up early so I could get a bike ride in before I had to do anything else. If I was bored on the weekends, my mom and I would walk to the mall, just to walk home again (a good 18 miles round trip). I became addicted to exercise at a young age (better than other addictions, I guess) and at one point was training to be a fitness competitor, working out 2 hours a day with weights and elliptical. I still don’t own a car and would really prefer a bicycle to get around, or my own 2 feet. It was good enough as a kid, it should be good enough now.
distinct syllables
Currently, the majority of our health care dollars are spent after a person is in crisis, when it costs the most to intervene and when the possibilities for full recovery are the slimmest. A recent study found that of the 7 million deaths from cancer worldwide in 2001, an estimated 35% were attributable to nine modifiable risks factors, all of which are controllable and most of which are under an individual’s own sovereignty.
Yep, it's all dahlias and mint around the house this week.
Ugh. It was awful and had zero function. It took me years of living in our home before I did anything with the space. Years. It was such a tricky spot to problem solve since it opens up right into our living room and there is such a small landing! Anything too bulky and you wouldn't be able to safely move past it. Yet, doing nothing at all would cause for unnecessary piles or an absolutely sparse and lonely space.
Meanwhile, more and more white families will lose their children to the real scourge of our society, the one our governments refuse to acknowledge and which they use these dishonest show trials to disguise.
EU funding, alongside other innovation and research funding, represents an opportunity for Wales to invest in skills and infrastructure tailored to the needs of inward investors. These decisions need to take into account the opportunities existing in emerging markets both as a source of future trade and of investment capital. In addition, opportunities exist to increase Wales's global status through its extensive network of current and former overseas University students. This should be maximised.
Something else simmering around here...garlicky goodness! This was my recipe tester batch that turned into a household favorite. (hence the small portion) =) A single portion from my kitchen is fit for feeding 2 or 3. Hehe! This colorful concoction is olive oil with garlic/tomato/red pepper flakes/oregano/parsley/salt & pep, later tossed with pasta and a hefty blast of fresh parmesan to finish. Rich in flavor, thank you garlic, the natural sweetness of the tomatoes meeting the hot red pepper flakes is a superb balance of yum! Measurements are generally eyeballed, so no 2 batches are the same...the taste test method seems to produce the best results. Even better - the immense joy I get in filling my honey's belly with food he enjoys so much...the requests for remakes make it that much sweeter! Awww, my sweet guy. =) Woman moment!
Data warehouse expertise
Without further ado (because this blog is WAY overdue), here are some pictures from the big day.
The self-catering cottage even had a game cabinet under the stairs full of books, board games and toys for the kids.
Like I said, the venders were great too. I told myself when I was driving over to the show that I was not going to buy a thing....famous last words......
I choose to feel that my superiors appreciate me! Amen!
You may now assemble the salad. Section tomatoes, if not bite size. Slice tamago thinly. Place noodles in each bowl, cover with veggies and tamago strips. Top with dressing and then nori and toasted sesame seeds.
A faggot of sticks to burn him.
Yesterday, just after returning home from work, I received the wake-up call I apparently needed. I was in a rush, turning around to go back to the car for a moment, when I suddenly slipped on the stairs in front of my house, which were slick with rain, and found myself cascading through the air, landing painfully on my chest, somehow managing to bruise it as well as my right shoulder and my left thigh. I also somehow sustained a nasty gash on my palm:
BOOM BABY! The Meat Tenderizer and a nice Skull Ring. Loveeellyyyyyy!
Skydiving. That was perfect. She saw the flyer on the window and instantly looked around to see if any eyes were on her. She took it down and put it in her bag. She stepped out of the coffee shop into the crisp fall air and realized she was still grasping the flyer in her hand in her bag.
Martial Canterel - Cities Of Ash
A fund has been doing well for several years and market timers begin to notice and buy in when unit values are historically high. Here is where there is maximum risk for the portfolio manager as maybe he/she would prefer to consolidate gains and look for newer alternatives.
1 cottages
Why the heck am I writing this post ?
Just see that I make an effort. Nothing
Child #4: I got a horrible fortune.
Made it right after I made the sponges and was pleased with my artistry...more so this successful rose gave me the courage to go ahead with the rest of the recipe I had decided…kinda’ good omen. (fingers crossed!)
I am not someone overly prone to emotion. Emotion scares me. But I felt something so strong when I realized this was mine for the next 6 months that I actually started crying. Which proceeded to make me panic. What have I done in my life that I deserve a chance to spend 6 months in the presence of one of the most beautiful things in the world.
bowed his head that I might uplift mine,
3) Being a military veteran gives you superpowers.
inhabitants
As fallen human beings, we have “turned in on ourselves” (a phrase used by St Augustine to describe the human heart). We are unable to fully and consistently love God because the affection of our heart is relentlessly drawn toward the wounded self. In a complicated blend of willful arrogance and instinctive (subconscious?) self-preservation, much of our spiritual energy is directed inward rather than outward. The result is a human being tragically out of touch with its Creator and often hopelessly self-absorbed.
There. Nice and succinct.
The election will turn on the economy but the question of character will haunt Romney.
Importantly, a center island will be added to Michigan Avenue in order to accommodate a new safe pedestrian walkway.
With the warm weather, comes family trips to the park. As part of Mother's Day this year, we decided to have a picnic at the park with the family. Normally our visits to the park are fairly short due to the fact that Ayden is just not a fan. The park includes just a lot of things he is not fond of - differing terrains, climbing, sliding, swinging - you know, park things. Over the past two years though, we have really been slowly working with him to try these things in the hopes that one day he would push past his sensory issues he has with them and enjoy himself. It's a lot of patience and hard work that usually ends in whining and crying, which makes the park a mild headache for mom and dad.
The day before:
“First celebrated in 1999, Take Your Dog To Work Day was created to celebrate the great companions dogs make and to encourage their adoption from humane societies, animal shelters and breed rescue clubs. This annual event asks pet lovers to celebrate the humane-canine bond and promote pet adoption by encouraging their employers to support TYDTWDay by opening their workplace to employees’ four-legged friends on this one special day.”
"A Short History of George Younger & Son Limited, Alloa, (1762 - 1925)", 1925, pages 1 - 2.
Bad, bad.
And because I love you.
At least I think I did.
As yet, there doesn’t appear to have been much negative Afghan comment, either from the population or from senior political opposition figures, to the announcement of the Strategic Partnership Agreement between the US and Afghanistan. This may be because the more controversial bits of any long-term US/Afghan deal – for example US bases in Afghanistan – have yet to be fully addressed. Atta, a significant political figure and a former member of the Northern Alliance, is a strong influence in Mazar-e Sharif and Northern Afghanistan. Although beholden to Karzai for his prestige governorship, during the last presidential elections, in 2009, there was a point where he looked like he might run against Karzai.
I get inspiration everywhere.
30-something: That noise? It’s a warning sign. Let me handle this now before I’m stuck on the road and have to call triple A.
Then….it was time for the big day. Easter….the day of the bunny and his tricks and gifts! The Easter Bunny brought each of the kids some candy and one gift. Usually the Easter Bunny does not go this big with presents, but we had an exception this year. Ryan got the Leapfrog music table from Santa this past Christmas. He loved it, but it broke after a month or so. Customer service was highly uncooperative so I was on the hunt for a replacement of the Baby Einstein or Fisher Price variety for cheap. Then I found an online Target coupon for 50% off Fisher Price toys….and the music table qualified. There also was a coupon for 50% of select Disney Princess items. It was like a sale just for my kids. Although Ryan’s gift was technically a replacement, any mother knows, one kid gets something, the other wants something. So I passed the deets on to the Easter Bunny and he got them for quite a steal, especially since he has a Target red card and gets 5% off all total purchases AND free shipping. Boo-yah!
12- The Russian Woodpecker Duga Radar Array, Chenobyl, Ukraine
h) childhood sexual abuse
Oh by the way, I'd also like to introduce everyone to my second addiction nowadays! CHEESE STICK DYNAMITE! Yummmmm. My first addiction is Ginger Tea btw.
Will our girl find true love?
Ruth E. Stuettgen has a keen interest in Magnetic Entrepreneurial Skills including Business Empowerment, Magnetic Empowerment Skills, Magnetic Time Management Techniques, Magnetic Selling and Marketing Skills and more. These are invaluable to small business owners and solopreneurs as well as other businesses. Log on to Focus on Balance website for more information and appointments. You can also contact Focus on Balance office via Tel: 1300 88 08 91 or seek additional contact details from the company web site.
It was one of the most beautiful sights I had ever seen in my entire life. And it stopped me. It stopped me in my path.
As I said mathematical equations is not my field, but I can tell you it involves the revolving angles of the double pyramid, which when calculated with precision comes to 26. The top pyramid represents our natural self dimensions, the bottom one represents the mirror worlds. the point at the very epicentre is deemed as zero point and is the gateway to other dimensions beyond our universe.
Automatic Bid: Big XII Conference Champions
So once breaky was in our belly (I waited till I got there, kids had already had cereal, but gorged on the pastries!) and our wetsuits on, we went to the reef. It was absolutely fantastic!
And when we find ourselves in the place just right,
Tagline:
By that same measure, the notion of Punch-Drunk Love as simply a variation on the “typical” Adam Sandler film also misses so much more—namely, it was also the one most clearly Anderson’s film in its stark cinematic originality. It is here—while ironically working in dialogue with Sandler’s persona—that I would argue Anderson began to fulfill his often premature industrial and cultural claim to auteur status.
While we know why you, boys, enjoy sex, her reasons often remain slightly more mysterious. Lucky for you I'm here to decode some of that mystery for you! Yes, you can thank me later!
He maketh the storm a calm, so that the waves thereof are still. Then are they glad because they be quiet; so he bringeth them unto their desired haven.
After the talk, we had a few minutes of lively discussion about a few points of club business. The highlights were:
Pakatan b.s. list (this is a small sampling) :
In 2008, Tom and Liz Rabb of New York paid Youngstown, Ohio, kennel owner Steve Croley $2,000 to provide obedience training for their Rottweiler Nitro. After two years in his acquaintance, they thought they knew Croley well enough to trust him with their dog. They also left three months’ worth of food and vitamins when they delivered Nitro to the kennel.
14 entered
A cruelty borne
to live very far away from family I love.
Nerdy apparel is nothing new, but if you’re an awesome nerd like me, you’ve come to the realization that Target’s and Kohl’s selection of graphic tees is just a bit too limited. Sure they might have a shirt with Mario or Spider-man on it, but the image just doesn’t hit that certain sweet spot that makes you smile. That perfect mix of cool, clever, and cute.
I gather up my courage, stand and make my way to the stage. Big hug for Joy Renee!
Emotionally
But you have clothed with mercy like a moss
After the roasting, the nuts are ground into a smoother paste, water is gradually added and the paste is mixed well by hand. The paste is kneaded by hand in large basins and water is gradually added to help separate out the butter oils. As they float to the top, the butter oils, which are in a curd state, are removed and excess water squeezed out.
I'm glad I've got some energy back now, because planning stuff like our backyard is what I live for! (I even spied a great teak bench for the backyard at HomeGoods today for $129! We CAN do this!)
Teasing comb
that you breathe
Another complication of this is called Thrombotic thrombocytopenic purpura or (TTP). TTP causes clotting of blood within small blood vessels, anemia due to fragmentation of red blood cells, and shortage of platelets (thrombocytopenia) that results in easy bruising, neurologic abnormalities, impaired kidney function, and fever. The difference is that TTP usually has a fever where HUS does not.
Now you need to get the files to host the server without the files you cannot set up a server. I am show you how to do it for Team Fortress 2 to do this you are gonna have to make a script in a .bat file using Notepad. Once you have opened Notepad you will need to enter.
- Not having to paint my own fingers and toes
And also that we may then unite in most humbly offering our prayers and supplications to the great Lord and Ruler of Nations and beseech Him to pardon our national and other transgressions; to enable us all, whether in public or private stations, to perform our several and relative duties properly and punctually; to render our National Government a blessing to all the people by constantly being a Government of wise, just, and constitutional laws, discreetly and faithfully executed and obeyed; to protect and guide all sovereigns and nations (especially such as have show kindness to us), and to bless them with good governments, peace, and concord; to promote the knowledge and practice of true religion and virtue, and the increase of science among them and us; and, generally to grant unto all mankind such a degree of temporal prosperity as He alone knows to be best.
Thursday night is often Pasta Night around here, because it's a kind of hectic evening. I do car pool after school and then hustle E off to tap class while C has guitar lessons. So I need to either have something in the crock pot ready to go, or I need to cook something that takes less than 45 minutes start to finish. (That's the window between dropping E off at the studio and having to run back to get her.) I like to mix it up; as good as marinara and meatballs are, we get sick of them pretty quick.
Since I'm just not happy until I've got a million projects going at once, I cut into my Going Coastal stash this week! After much deliberation, I've decided to make a simple patchwork quilt. I wanted something easy and quick so I can use it this summer, but that would show off the awesome prints, so I think this will be perfect. I can't wait to finish this one!
I hope that you, the reader, will share your thoughts about this book with me. Please drop me a line at: ljhadaway@hotmail.com
There something astonishingly sad about both the futility of John’s actions and about our voyeuristic posturings to see them. For instance, why do we go through such lengths to know John and why does John, alone in the deep space, have to hide in crater? What makes this sculpture such a delight is that these questions are not answered through narrative -- instead the formal elements allow us to feel the interaction between the art and ourselves, to feel our direct relationship with the work.
The lager first: Daniel-Trunk Kellerbier. It's naturtrüb, as the label makes clear: very cloudy, rendered yet murkier by the dark brown colouring. My kellerbier experience is limited, but I thought they tended to be paler than this. Daniel's keller needs a lightswitch. A hit of malteser on the nose is scant preparation for the massive ovaltine flavour. The sweetness is somewhat offset by a tang which I think is down to the age of the beer: I'm drinking it a good two months after the best-before, and it's a style I'm sure isn't meant for aging. Though what it's like when all that residual sugar is in full-flow doesn't bear thinking about.
Special effects look different. Look at the blobbing and the bricks. You can see how the color pushes out of the way on the regular paper, but on the glossy it just gets lighter. It doesn't stand out quite as much, but the edges are crsiper than they are on regular paper. You might like one better than another.
It's more like I'm the hostess of a party. I sent invitations to my kids to join me in my life as honored guests. And they each had no choice but to accept my invitation. Now my goal is for all of us to have a good time. I suggest and plan fun things for us to do. I invite other interesting people to join us.
I’m looking for information about my great grandfather, Jesus Martinez. I have been working on my family tree and thought maybe there’s someone out there who may have information about my ancestors.
I used Krylon indoor/outdoor paint in gloss blue ocean breeze (leftover from my play kitchen accessories and bow box) and painted the whole surface. But that looked a little plain, so I taped off half-ish with painter's tape (after waiting for the turquoise paint to cure for 24 hours):
us for many years.
Meanwhile, however, one agent was willing to engage in a little more discussion of what she didn’t like about ‘Pilgrims’. Several of the agents had referred to the main character as being the problem, and this agent did too. More specifically she said that for her the protagonist didn’t fit in the thriller genre, but much more in ‘women’s fiction’.
Did I have a fluid spirit, but after a death, a breakup, a financial hardship
This demonstrates so well the truth of Hebrews 10:31.
Summer arrived late and with fall looming for most of the country our weather has just gotten perfect. Warm days in the mid to low 70s filled with sunshine. The Olympic Peninsula is the place to be right now.
Even royal births are public spectacles. Over 150 people crushed into Marie Antionette's bedchamber to witness the birth of her first child, Princess Marie Therese, who sadly was to die before her first birthday. For such a rarified, privileged society this all seems truly bizarre. And this is before we start considering the behaviours involving official mistresses.
Today is week 1 of Lynn Ghahary's four-part video series on the new PageMaps/Spellbinders dies. Lynn did such a fantastic job (thank you, Lynn!!) on this how-to video, creating a fully-loaded, dimensional page featuring PB&J by BasicGrey, not to mention fresh and unique ways to use the dies. It is one of those times that, after watching the whole series, I just wanted to drop everything I was doing and scrap! Here is part one and we invite you to stop in every Monday in May to check out the next installment:
Well, anyway, Ayase ends up with Shu’s transmitter and thinks it’s a pen. She won’t give it back when he asks because doing something like that would be what a normal person does and not a shittily written tsundere archetype. But I digress. She’ll give it back if he passes the test in a week to see if he’s fit to join the undertakers. The rest of the episode basically is just a training montage, except with a couple of scenes to make it clear to Shu that Gai is not his friend, and Shu failing to hit on Inori. But c’mon, he was asking her to join him and leave the Undertakers, despite the fact that a) he isn’t even a member yet, b) has no idea about Inori’s relationship to them, and c) has only known Inori for like 2 weeks if that, so is being rather presumptuous about how much he means to her.
former being light and plastic and stingy and the latter is wooden and very effective... but then, since my lover managed to break the original friendly one with her marvellous buns... she might not agree! *vbg*
The peacemaking spirit is divine.
MAHER: You could have went to New Hampshire and killed two birds with one stone.
I just thought I'd mention that left right confusion. I'm thinking of getting new flags made which I can send to the mis-labeled anarchists. It would be a capital I instead of capital A in the middle of a circle. Or maybe a question mark, as a friend suggested. The I would stand for idiot. Then they could really be in solidarinosc; "Idiots of the wold unite!" Plenty of takers for that proposition.
What do you do in your family to have your children resolve sibling conflicts?
Alas, the weekend is over. It was a good one, too. It was my first time in LA for something other than driving through to San Diego or stopping in Carson for a soccer game. We still spent most of our time at the beaches instead of in the city, and watching the Timbers lose. Again.
Respect is, quite clearly, due…
One recipe to go for my apples!
I was in London today. I was doing an event as part of the StarLit Festival organised by the Shoreditch Trust. A group of Year 4, 5 and 6 primary school children from Queensbridge School came to see me at the Waterside Restaurant. They asked lots of very good questions and were a pleasure to be with. We had a lot of fun and then we got to eat some nice food for lunch. It was all very civilised.
As for me, I have my jewels (my children.) My treasures (their artwork and handmade gifts they’ve given me over the years; family photos; and the like.) And a few things handed down to me from my ancestors–dresses from my mother, grandmothers and a great-grandmother; costume jewelry from my mother and grandmothers; a book about Paris from my grandpa; a table and chairs from a grandmother; a white trunk that traveled from England and carted the entirety of my great-great grandmother, Mary Ann Quinn’s, worldly possessions to Utah in the 1800s; and various family stories, all of which I appreciate because “Family stories make the most valuable heirlooms.” (Unknown)
I love biology and I'm always wanting more of it in my life.
We may or may not put the extra bed in the craft room. Still not decided. We may end up putting the bed in the tiny finished room (and put our kids down there when we have guests) and the futon furniture in the craft room, which I think would be a good compromise.
And once you build your first couple projects, be proud of them. They represent the beginning of your exciting adventure in woodworking. The first project I made (which I no longer have because someone in the house pitched it) was a few small pieces of wood tacked together to form a box, and a scrollsawn cactus, painted with crazy southwestern designs, glued on the front.
Cinnamon-Swirl Raisin Bread
These are divided into Free, $1, and $2 categories. You just pay the price of the book (if any), plus shipping. Rates are listed at the very, very bottom of this post, and I do ship internationally. If you've got a lot of books you're interested, I can look into doing a Priority flat rate box, since it might be cheaper (depending on where you live).
The Hunger Games is the tween world’s latest sensation, thankfully, making everyone forget about the awful Twilight series. I always felt embarassed, shameful, and slightly dirty whenever I read one of the Twilight books or snuck into one the movies behind a gaggle of pre-teen girls. I probably felt this way because Bella as a lead character was obnoxious, nobody ever died – not that that is a prerequisite for awesomeness, but it doesn’t hurt -, and the whole “Team Edward versus Team Jacob” left me fleeing to team “I Don’t Give a Fuck”.
This is a picture of Max right after he pulled himself up from his butt to his feet for the first time! No one was in the room when he did it so thankfully Tim walked in while he was still up. I was downstairs when he walked in on him so he yelled for me to quickly but quietly come up to Max's room. I ran upstairs and went into his room. It took me a minute to realize what I was looking at but when I did I immediately got tears in my eyes and ran to get my camera. Saying that I am proud of him is an understatement.
“So are you saying you believe me?”
Pilafs made from rice or wheat. Dishes- savory and sweet- made using yogurt. Turkish cuisine is filled with vegetables, and if I wanted I could even make a vegetarian supper quite easily. Kebabs, meatballs, and chicken Tava sound so good though. They all seem to be calling my name! Of course I mustn't forget the soup, which is a very traditional way to start a meal over there, and perfect for a cool November evening.
Number of bytes (which can represent a single number or letter) sent over the Internet last year, according to University of Minnesota researchers. Internet traffic is growing at an annual rate of 50 to 60 percent.
Well you may not have met the gorgeous Trixie, in the days of her youth she was a great star of the screen and stage.
“I serve no Master,” the hooded man said, the chords of his arms tightening beneath the skin. “And I see the Force as neither light nor dark. I see it as a means to an end. A tool used to achieve my goals. A weapon to cut down any who stand in my way.”
This article was published the weekend of Dad funeral, he would have been so so proud to see me 'quoted' in the New York Times. I have not re-produced the photos but can't get rid of the captions - sorry.
* Did achieving your first book deal change the way you approach your writing?
CD 1: Cycle starts TSH 0.74
I also used embossing powder to create my title.
It seems a few hours
When chicken is cooked, removed from pot.
I don't know who's running the seminaries and my sample rate is admittedly small, but it seems that only the dullest speakers are allowed to be ordained in the Church.
Bar Hemingway t-shirt
Further more, I will simply copy-paste the fallacy used and not reply any further to the comment until you reply without a fallacy. Am I an angry asshole? At this moment of the post, Yes I am. Frustration comes from someone who simply doesnt want to open their mind, eyes, and ears to the world around them who I have been arguing with lately. Yes, I would call it arguing. Yes, I would call you out on your Bullshit in a post.
He’ll be here in about an hour to pick me up for dinner with his parents. Yay.
“This legal initiative reflects the reality of new politics in Singapore, where citizens not only expect engagement but are angered by an approach that shows disrespect to their voices,” she added.
Wright: Johnny Weissmuller died on this day. Which jungle-swinging character clad only in a loincloth did he play?
Okay, so it’s been like a week or so, and I just want to update you guys on my life. I enjoy reading the emails I get from people who read my blog. (tanishaf_90@yahoo.com) So what’s on my mind?
I have to assume it’s because we have less trees on the hill so they are coming into the residential area more. Don’t get me wrong though, I love listening to them and watching them but it does raise the concern that they are more open to attack from domestic cats. All the great work the Bluff Hill/Motupohue Environment Trust are doing trapping pests on the hill and the bloody birds are going to get killed because their trees were removed and they’ve migrated towards the township hence this picture always pisses me off.
Optimise Home Report
The book is fun to read, especially if you're familiar with this area, or have lived here for some time.
First off is the new original painting - a CUSTOM Faces of Faery - this is the 181st in the series. The winning bidder will receive the painting in the photos, but first they will get to tell me the following: **Haircolour/Style (I can make it shorter, curly, add bangs, whatever you'd like) **Eye Colour, Makeup **Skintone, Freckles, Tattoos **Wings if you'd like me to fit some in (note the size & placement of the face on the panel, it'd be a hint of them or very small ones). Maybe you'd like me to customize it to resemble a friend or family member - perhaps include their favourite flowers, or a small pet - as a special Christmas gift (they'd be very surprised!).
"But while Obama took veiled shots at Clinton," Kreiger notes, "he named only McCain in addressing the crowd of cheering supporters who heard him speak Tuesday night in Wisconsin, the site of one of next Tuesday's primaries."
Em, I have indeed done "Mad Men" for a vintage event recently (scroll down for lots of detail photos). I don't watch "Boardwalk Empire, so I have no idea what the clothing looks like. And I've done boudoir photos, but they aren't suitable for the blog. Hee!
Few wars end with the decisiveness of World War II. Clearly, Vietnam did not.
PTC Thermisters are switching type and their resistance suddenly rises at some critical temperature. The PTC Thermister is made up of doped polycrystalline Ceramic containing Barium titanate and other compounds. The dielectric constant of PTC Thermister varies with the temperature. Below the Curie point temperature, the high dielectric constant prevents the formation of potential barrier between the crystal grains of the material which keeps the Thermister at low resistance. When the Curie point reaches, the dielectric constant drops and a potential barrier develops at the boundary of crystals. This increases the resistance sharply. But if the temperature is too high, sometimes the PTC Thermister reverts to NTC character.
For your sacred art
Sailing o'er life's solemn main,
“Sandy Koufax Jews Down Cubs”
Right below is a drawer which I love to use for all those Pillsbury containers and bagels!
What is your most and least favorite day of the week?
I saw a post this morning which really struck a chord with me and has given me pause to wonder if, at last, I am doing what I was destined to do with my life? And, more importantly, am I doing with my life that which God is asking that I do?
“Oh, I’m sorry. I totally forgot. What’s up?”
...btw. my flight is booked and I volunteered to hold my Refilsaum and Klosterstich (hands on) class - hopefully I will see some of you at Ffair Rhaglen (August / Insulae Draconis) and I think I will make at least one Guild banner for Rhaglen :)
so i've put together six (6) prize packs, three (3) books each.
To this day that week is responsible for the destruction of all fences between us and the end of the last bridge on the Old Railway. They went up in flames to keep us warm in the night. We are responsible for regular vertical posts without any horizontal cross posts on the east section of the lines.
Everyone was moaning at her - for being in my craft room and using my bitz and bobz.
Sleep? Pretty good, but still have weird dreams surprise, surprise.
I might be being a bit too dramatic here.
Miles and Wood identify the style of the story as being that of children’s television, and if I may be so bold as to suggest, we’re basically on different tones for the same thing here. As Miles and Wood note, children’s adaptations were commonplace. And the BBC was, in 1981, in the midst of an epic series of adaptations of all of Shakespeare’s plays. This is a straightforward example of Doctor Who nicking a production style from elsewhere on television.
Bags, baby food and a spice rack that we don't even use!
I then proceeded to drive 600km(373mi) home. Whats with that…no sleep and the hardest race ever… I think my wife was equally tired if not more so. While I was off enjoying myself she was trying to shepherd two rambunctious children under 4 around Sydney on one of the most hectic public transport days of the year.
Still in Phnom Penh. I ate 2 bites of papaya before nausea overtook me. PCMO came to the hotel to draw my blood. They came back to the hotel to give me an IV and tell me my platelets were dropping too fast and they had to send me to Bangkok. I cried. I cried about everything that day. Because of the IV I had to use the bathroom, but I was so nauseous. Every time I used the bathroom I vomited. It was horrible. I had eaten nothing all day, but was still vomiting. This was by far the worst day of my dengue experience.
Well, not actually me in particular...just my book.
They are on the high side of Glycemic Index number and you need to put a limit on consuming these snow white beauty too often--unless you have super high metabolism like mine...
This is my favourite of the photos… what do you think?
WHAT ARE THE TERMS?
When we take a look at the meaning and understanding of the term maḍhab, we are introduced for some short and not very informative explanations, such as a maḍhab being “a school of thought whether legal or philosophical (Bilal Philips), “a legal opinion or juristic principle adopted by a legist; a legal school” (Hallaq), “a school of thought, such as a school of law or theology” (Saeed), “’way,’ that is, one of the recognized Sunni schools of law” (Berkey).
“But you always pay for dinner…”
One advantage to watercolor painting on Yupo (plastic) is that you can always make changes. One disadvantage is that the NC Watercolor Society doesn't let you enter paintings done on Yupo. So, I continue to work on paintings such as the first which is on watercolor board.
Of course there has to be a down side...I'm now completely distracted from today's task to clear up the house which always gets neglected the week before I do a big THEA too shop update. But just a few hours won't make a difference will it...:0)
Archive’s visiting hours: Mon-Fri, 9:30 am to 4 pm.
About 30 minutes later a lady from the office comes on and says "oh I am sorry" we did not get the authorization from the insurance company yet. She said this is a very expensive consult and we can NOT see you until we get it.
I don’t know if this is a deliberate act by the locals designed to keep us walkers on tenterhooks but this is the last section of wall our heroes see today. Not that we are disheartened. The rest of the walk is quite charming. If one can ignore the increasing number of bogs of mud, faeces, water and urine at every gate, style and ladder. Yes, Ok so we all know it’s only Bovine and Ovine but that doesn’t stop the sinking feeling that enters your stomach as your foot slips beneath the crust of a green bit and the gloupy suckiness tries to enter your footwear. At least that’s the impression Our Hero got whenever his Trusty Side-kick looked upon yet another fan of concentrated country-side on each side of a crossing point between fields.
For a long time, the lack of legs has hindered Vraks renegade armies everywhere. Either there weren't the legs for the renegades or there were scores of cadian torsos and heads languishing in boxes for want of some form of parambulatory aparatus. No longer. Pig Iron have finally answered the call with something more than suitable, something which cries out for another platoon or two of renegades.
So I can't come to explain why several weeks back I got my hands on both Vampire on Titus, and Propeller, again. It might have been the few tracks from it coming up on the Matador-era best-of CD that I have on my iPod, or it might have just been something I saw on a (shhhh) torrent site and said, well, why not?
Yet in her solid form, she stands for each of us as guide and mother, sister and child.
What do you think about the combinations I made? Patterned velvet fabrics for the bouillonnées and plain velvet for a bergère upholstery? Or a patterned velvet cushion in a plain upholstered sofa,…1. Lizzo Selena Collection 2. Lizzo Velvet Libray Natural Collection 3. Lizzo Velvet Library Intense Collection 4. Lizzo Selena Collection
Walton's
In the Needle, Borsten has left the rejuvenation bubble where he was recovering from his last trip to the 2042. A guard enters the room to state that Harris has escaped from the statis tubes. Borsten demands that Harris be recaptured and that he wants his head guard, Brollin, on the job. Another guard explains that Brolin is mourning his father who was a waste-disposal driver murdered by Hex.
To those who hold it dear
Sae little noo I ken, o’ yon blessèd, bonnie place
door de kolken
Help to pick winners
#1 was able to get away from school, but had to fly back by herself on Sunday evening.
After five months of pre-production and rehearsals, its “showtime” for the Boulder Community Media – Wyoming Community Media production of the “Hynds Building New Creative Economy” project.
He answered questions and one was about how to raise a kind child. He said that what children need most of all is affection. You need to spend time with your children. When they are old enough, you must teach them about the value of human qualities. Then he said he did not have all the answers, as he does not have children. He said maybe, even if he’s 77, he should get married and have a child so he would know more!
The Commission has appointed a new Director of Cultural Affairs, Tom De Caigny comes to the position with many years of experiences, lastly as executive director of the Performing Arts Workshop, DeCaigny will officially assume his new role leading the $10 million agency responsible for championing the arts in San Francisco on January 9, 2011. I wish him luck because he will need it.
touch /etc/asterisk/gtalk.conf
1. Grow my hair longer than it currently is. Maybe die it brown if that’s organic. Probably grow some beardy thing. I can do this despite my relative youth because I’m very masculine. I enjoy sports and criticising people. I can also break sticks with my hands depending on how early it is in the morning.
heart-driven, power
My socks were supplemented by my wife working for the Stella Artois tennis tournament that was an annual pre-Wimbledon warm-up. For some reason she was given lots of branded white socks, which she passed on to me despite her loathing of the white sock look.
Barboursville make good wines, they have been growing vitis vinifera grapes in Virginia longer than anyone else and their winemaker has been there for 20 odd years – the experience and consistency shows.
her husband was killed in the earthquake, her home left in shambles, and the business that her family ran was lost. she had no way to survive but to get her allotted portion of rice each day from the rations that were served to all the victims. soon, the rice would run out and there were many families that would be left starving, including her and her daughter.
During good times, I was able to freelance to help supplement our household. This became especially important when my husband was injured while working and our normal income was substantially decreased. It was during that period of time when I began branching out more and ended up with a full-time position with a company in California. We quickly realized that I was not able to care for our youngest son (or our oldest) in the same manner as before. While we did what we could while we could, when my husband was laid off at the end of October, I took on a second job. My secondary income came through a freelancing position. I worked both jobs for almost 5 months.
I have always loved the way this book evokes the importance of family, friends, and community—how people together can accomplish something that one person cannot.
Here is a comment we received from Jenny.
"Exception to the rule!" he countered. "If that farmer had had a hill, he would have planted it there. Didn't you look at the millions of vineyards we drove past? Don't you remember how the grapes were planted in the worst places possible--steep hills, the worst soil, under piles of rocks? Grapes are amazing! If they have to struggle, they bear more fruit. They just keep on doing what they do, through everything. But make them comfortable and all you get is leaves!"
Benjamin Franklin Keith was born in Hillsboro Bridge, New Hampshire in 1846, the textbook definition of a Yankee, and he would prove himself appropriately tight-fisted. At age 14, he mustered enough romance to run away and join the circus as a roustabout. From there, he found himself in the world of dime museums.
I decided to make an easel card with the picnic table and flower pot image. I used a sheet of tan card to shape the easel and the 'stop' strip. I coloured the image with Promarkers and added a red satin heart, from Create and Craft, to the heart on the pot. I filled the centre of the heart with red glitter. After I cut the image in to a rectangle I added Distress Ink to the edges. Three pieces of Card Candi are at each side of the image. The paper is from a First Edition pad, Hideaway. The 'stop' is made with the tan card and then a piece of orange ribbon is centred across it. The large image of the flower is also coloured with Promarkers and then I cut it out, very carefully, and centred it on the base. Some Diamond Dust is at the centre of the flower.
The Nate Show, parties and shopping were of course fun, but the people I met were the highlight. So many talented designers and bloggers. In particular, I loved getting to know and hanging with Kate, Rhoda, Emily {& her friend Katie}, Sarah, Janell, Lakeitha, Jade, and Lana. And at the end of the day, that is what is most important anyway, isn't it?
Human beings get lonely. Think about it right now, if your reading this maybe your on your own, or maybe your lucky enough to be sitting beside a friend or someone you care about. But when you are all alone, where is everybody else?
“It’s like that herd instinct you were telling me about one time. We’re due for each other.”
But one explorer knew more than most. Because of his fear of being unable to find his way home, he developed an intricate code and tattooed his map onto his skin. But the map has since been lost and rival factions are in desperate competition to recover it. What none of them yet realize is that the skin map itself is not the prize at the end of this race . . . but merely the first goal of a vast and marvelous quest to regain Paradise.
The culmination of all kinds of yoga practices lies in bhakti-yoga. All other yogas are but means to come to the point of bhakti in bhakti-yoga. Yoga actually means bhakti-yoga; all other yogas are progressions toward the destination of bhakti-yoga. From the beginning of karma-yoga to the end of bhakti-yoga is a long way to self-realization. Karma-yoga, without fruitive results, is the beginning of this path. When karma-yoga increases in knowledge and renunciation, the stage is called jñāna-yoga. When jñāna-yoga increases in meditation on the Supersoul by different physical processes, and the mind is on Him, it is called aṣṭāṅga-yoga. And, when one surpasses the aṣṭāṅga-yoga and comes to the point of the Supreme Personality of Godhead Kṛṣṇa, it is called bhakti-yoga, the culmination. Factually, bhakti-yoga is the ultimate goal, but to analyze bhakti-yoga minutely one has to understand these other yogas. The yogī who is progressive is therefore on the true path of eternal good fortune.
Like the stairs. I would happily sit all day on the stairs.
News of the World – The Sun – The Sunday Times – Mirror publications – The Telegraph group via Associated Newspapers – the Met Police – Westminster politics – the Royal Family – the Coalition – 10 Downing Street – the security services – the stock markets – the plot to oust Tony Blair.
“Anyone can be passionate, but it takes real lovers to be silly.” ~Rose Franken
Roger Waters’ extraordinary production of The Wall has smashed attendance records in South America with a record breaking 15 open-air stadiums shows in Chile, Brazil and Argentina, playing to over 750,000 fans. This is the largest number of stadium shows ever played in South America by an international artist on one tour. The South American leg included a record breaking 9 sold out shows in Buenos Aires, River Plate Stadium, exceeding the previous record of 5 nights, held by the Rolling Stones (see link below to photos of The Wall in River Plate Stadium).
Photographs of Villa Labia rooms by Gianni Berengo-Gardin for an essay published in The World of Interiors, April 1987.
Please visit April's Moore Magnets Blog to follow her Time Management series, I hope you will enjoy her frank and focused style as well as her tips! You will also find links there to her FB/Twitter, and website as well.
All superb...thank you to you all
All of a whipwhirl’s attacks are based on its ability to wrap itself around the specific area of its target (on a successful “to hit” roll.) The duration for each form of whipwhirl attack lasts until that whipwhirl is killed.
To start..I used water color paper, rubber stamped my image from sugarloafproducts.com. I used my heat tool to dry the ink, and then used my metallic water color paints on the image. I again used the heat tool to dry the paper and paint. I then splattered more water color paints over the dried image. Using scrapbook paper and corrugated kraft paper as a background, I used my Tim Holtz stapler to attach the stamped image to the background papers. To finish the card I then ran the papers thru my Xyron, and attached the piece to a folded teal cardstock. It's a shame that the scanned card doesn't show the pretty shimmer of the metallic paints.
On wednesday our internet cut off, I nearly cried.-__- But I found other ways to occupy myself anyway. Went out to lunch with my granny in Holywood, went to a place called The Dirty Duck, which despite the name is LOVELY (if a tad expensive..). Had really nice Oak Smoked Haddock. After that we had a walk around the shops in Holywood, saw a few cute places with things I want to buy, a few places I'd like to take Jake, and had a hunt for something to get my mum for her birthday next weekend. Was a really lovely day.^_^
01 Ruby-Paraffin (Red Snapper Mix)
Then as so often happens, she saw me. "Officer, can you please make my son get up off the floor?"
I did actually laugh, for quite a long time and my pelvic floor's not what it was (apologies for the TMI)
Is it preaching that has gone wrong? Or is it something deeper?
It’s been a rough couple of weeks… as I lost someone close to me. Parting ways with a physical life…someone who had such a big presence… is extremely difficult for me. Channeling my grief was not as easy as I thought it would be, either. Some days, its my greatest “motivator” to get out and run to clear my head, cry, pray… Other days, want to do DIDDLEY SQUAT. And I forced it anyway. Even days when my body said “enough already!”…I forced it. *shrug* Why not?
As I went on the hunt to find the Too Faced recently launched Spring Collection, I came up zero. Ugh. I really love to see things in person if I can, so I was pretty sad. Suddenly, I noticed on the Too Faced display that they had put out a tester of the newish Matte Eye Shadow Collection and ONE palette left to actually purchase. Hmmmm... I'm iffy with my mattes. It's hard to find ones that are smooth enough that they don't apply super patchy. Upon swatching in store, I was impressed (and obviously others were too since there was only the one left to buy), so I took the new Matte Eye Shadow Collection home to play with.
Stir powdered sugar and 2 teaspoons orange juice in small bowl until sugar dissolves. Mix in more juice by 1/2 teaspoonfuls to reach consistency of heavy cream. Spoon icing over cake, allowing it to drip down sides. Let stand until icing sets, at least 30 minutes. DO AHEAD: Can be made 3 days ahead. Cover with cake dome and store at room temperature.
Looks at them sleep! So adorable!!
“During my church Bible study today we spoke about how the present church doesn’t call out sin anymore giving rise to situations where people now say,”Well I’m sorry, this is how God made me; accept me or leave me” when actually God DIDN’T make you stubborn, and your sin is pride and stubbornness which you must repent of and ask God to change your heart…. Another one is “I’m just so focused” when the truth is you’re just so selfish!
This weighs up the pain and pleasure generated by the available moral actions to find the best option. There are 7 components.
Take a sheet of nori. You will notice that there are small scoring on the inside of the nori. These are exactly 1″ and are perfect for gunkan. Trim these with very sharp scissors and you will get 5X strips of nori 1″X 7″. The shiny side is the outside of the gunkan. Make and oval with the nori strip and seal the end by lightly moistening the last inch and press ends together. Fill each nori oval with about 1 Tblsp. of the rice, and lightly tamp down (I used the butt end of a butter knife.) Top with pepper garnish. Ideally, you would still have a small lip of the nori above the garnish.
bitter and sour;
Police spokesperson Chaka Marope says charges of rape and housebreaking are being investigated.
They: No, it is better for you if you take the underground.
“There are a lot of very convenient elements to this story, as you said Joy, it really makes me cringe. We have this black woman who suddenly almost becomes this mascot for the campaign,” said MSNBC contributor Janell Ross. “She is sort of affirming all sorts of Conservative ideas about who is poor and how certain people deal with their poverty and seek out the assistance of a wealthy white man to hand you some form of aid.”
And that I have been doing! My Household Binder is now packed with goodies, and nearing completion! Oh the joy my happy heart is feeling!
modern peacekeeping operations to
I created the Mom's side portion of the menu with simply red and white wine, and two types of beer. After running it past her, she thought that mimosas, espresso martinis, and a third beer offering were in order. I had to politely remind her that this was a Sunday afternoon event - no need to run the gamet on alcoholic beverages! We compromised and ended up somewhere in the middle. For the Dad's side of the menu, I found this suggestion for punch on a cooking board that I frequent. I wanted to do something other than just water and soda, and this was a fabulous choice! What are your family gatherings like? Are the offerings more like Mom's side or Dad's side?
The Final Verdict: It won't make converts out of those who don't like science fiction, but it's an interesting futuristic tale that warrants a good look! Three and a half out of five stars.
UK Publishers: EMI Music Publishing / Noble & Brite
So, in conclusion, book trailers won’t have a huge impact on sales because about one in every three people will watch them (and the blurb and sample are still the most vital parts to a reader), but if done right, they can’t hurt you; they’ll only help.
After trying to think of different ways I could get the ball rolling for the brewery, I started looking at industrial units around and about. One was next to an engineering factory - the smells would have tainted the beer. The next closest was over the border in England - about 5 miles over the border.
And boy does she remember Max.
Brady turned 8 months AND started crawling. I didn't know what to expect from him because his sister waited sooooo long to crawl (10.5 months). He is all over the place and just like I expected, is in to EVERYTHING. Picking up food of his tray is not a problem for him. Those little Gerber cheese puff things are his favorite. I bought them in the maple cinnamon flavor the other day though because the smell of the cheese ones makes me want to vom. Sleeping is still going great. He usually wakes up once a night to nurse and sleeps 10-12 hours a night. He gets solids at breakfast, lunch and dinner and does pretty well with eating. Lately, he seems to love peas and green beans. Nursing still happens about every 4 hours. Still no teeth! I'm kind of surprised, I know Arianna had her first at this point. Our drop-offs at the YMCA when I get workout are gettin better. Yesterday was the first time in a longgggg time that he didn't cry when I left. The teacher said that he did really good and only cried once while I was upstairs working out! We were just at the Dr. for what looked like ringworm but turned out to be excema (they think) and he weighed 19 lbs! Finally gaining some weight back after a long bout of being sick with Croup and some other nasty virus. Most 6-12 month clothing is fitting our little man these days :) Here are some pictures of my smiley little guy
But they fall on deaf ears
are singing the national anthem only
When I started this Weekly Wodehouse wheeze, I had a vague idea of quoting a little bit of ‘his master’s voice’, to share with Plum lovers and newcomers alike, followed by a few short words of my own, expanding on the theme – a chance to develop my own writing.
So, want to see what I came up with?
Brouwerij Sterkens N.V. St. Sebastiaan Dark
Words that attack like rays or vipers
The term Fourth Estate refers to the press, or to be more ‘politically correct’ the media. According to Wikipedia, the term goes back at least to Thomas Carlyle in the first half of the 19th century. Novelist Jeffrey Archer in his work The Fourth Estate made the observation: “In May 1789 Louis XVI summoned to Versailles a full meeting of the “Estates General” The First Estate consisted of three hundred clergy. The Second Estate, three hundred nobles. The Third Estate, six hundred commoners. Some years later, after the French Revolution, Edmund Burke looking up at the Press Gallery of the House of Commons, said, ‘Yonder sits the Fourth Estate, and they are more important than them all.’”
Monoglycerides/Glycerides – From animal fat. In margarines, cake mixes, candies, foods, etc. In cosmetics. Alternative: vegetable glycerides. See also Glycerin.
-I would have told you "I love you" and that it was my privilege to care for you when you could no longer care for yourself.
Ok, back to the story: So, we found these pallets and since we always drive around
“Well,” said Mark, “I know what I want the effect on the audience to be. I want it to be quite hypnotic and dreamlike and for the audience to enter a sort-of trance-like state. That again is why using Stewart Lee’s act is quite good, because he does all that repetition stuff anyway… So feeling ‘mesmerised’ is good.
“Selections that are selling will increase in price, and those that aren't will go down. We think this creates a unique social experience that goes beyond just having a drink," Horne said.
Thursday, Nov. 25th, 1:07 p.m
- Fig Truffle
Does anyone have any comments/reviews on this gear? I’ll provide my own thoughts as soon as I crack em’ open.
Whatever it is you have settled on…this polling cycle.
Maybe I’m just one of a dying breed who values intelligence and worldliness, but I hate talking to people who have no idea what’s happening around the world.
Anyway, enough of the self-justification. The point is, yesterday, in Washington DC, while on one of these shameful excursions,I heard an exchange that made the whole thing worthwhile. After the tour guide had told us about Thurgood Marshall, the first African-American justice of the Supreme Court and the lawyer behind the Brown v. the Education Department case and explained that the Brown case ended segregation, I heard the small boy in front of me ask his mother, 'What's segregation?'
a sexy hour glass figure. Sweet and sexy, just how I like it.
1/04: AF and baseline U/S
P.S., I forgot to mention that the Bobby & Laurie record I posted will soon be reissued on CD, so grab it now. I'll be taking it down & letting you know where to get the CD when it comes out.
- Ultra safe mode
I really think I need to switch those two stars, it is really bugging me, lol.
We hope you will continue to use the many FJ products available in your area.
Chal Port won 641 games and seven Southern Conference championships at The Citadel, but the opening paragraph on any story about his career at the military college always prominently includes that 1990 squad, and justifiably so. At the time, longtime Clemson coach Bill Wilhelm said he didn’t know of “a lower-budget team to go to the College World Series,” and he wasn’t being patronizing in any way.
THE ROMANCE
Okay, I admit it, I've caught the sewing bug. It shows no signs of slowing down and I've got a jumbo list of gifts I want to sew up for Christmas. One project I'm looking forward to is making superhero capes for my little nephews and nieces. I decided to do a test first and make one for my own little superhero.
My Minds eye Lost & found Madison ave. for the text paper
Packed to fill the peace that is lacking
We learned a little about The MET's recruitment, enrollment and orientation process, and we are eager to learn more because we continue to get phone calls and emails from families and youth who want to Enroll with New Orleans Liberation Academy this Fall. From The MET, we're wondering: How do you orient your students to a radically different educational environment than what they have experienced all their lives in order for them to be successful?
- 2 avocados, cubed
These snickerdoodles are good old-fashioned snickerdoodles.....no hidden surpises......just a super yummy chewy cookie that is dunked in cinnamon sugar. One of the hubby's favorite kinds of cookie! This is the best snickerdoodle recipe I've tried....it's from Joanne Chang at Flour Bakery, so that's no surprise. The cookies don't flatten out much when they bake, and they stay nice and chewy (nothing worse than a crispy snickerdoodle).
And if you are wondering about our chickens....well, the girls are laying eggs like crazy, about 17-20 a day. It's so nice to have fresh eggs to enjoy and share with the family:)
14. August 2009
Ph 0887259561 or 0887235550
beloved friends, time is really flying and Easter is almost here.
Again, Em voiced what we were all thinking. “What if it’s money in there?”
Didier Malherbe - Soprano Sax, Flute & Doudouk
(Te Kakeega II)
Jang Ja Yeon plays plays Sunny as part of the JinSeonMi group who are always against Geum JanDi. She was found dead in her apartment on 7th March – she had commited suicide and hung her herself.
***Remember if you do 5 cards this month following the challenge, your name will go into a draw for the above prize at the end of February! (this challenge CAN be combined with any other blog or forum challenges that you do this month.)
If you live in the Cincinnati or Northern Kentucky area, this place is a must try, especially if you have little ones. Classic stands like this are hard to come by, and home made root beer is too.
and moon from a night last week
On April 17th, JYP Entertainement stated, “We have determined that the netizen’s words are not to be taken lightly, and thus on April 16th, we filed a lawsuit for contempt and the violation of the law on telecom networks and information protection against ‘A’. On April 17th, we proceeded on with the investigation.”
Matthew Shardlake is a lawyer who occasionally undertakes commissions for Thomas Cromwell, the powerful and ruthless chief minister of Henry VIII. A keen reformer, Shardlake believes the monasteries are corrupt and supports Cromwell’s attempts to force the large monasteries into ‘voluntary’ surrender. When one of Cromwell’s commissioners, a brutal thug called Robin Singleton, is violently murdered while investigating the monastery of Scarnsea on the Sussex coast, Cromwell sends Shardlake to investigate. Snowbound in the isolated monastery, Shardlake finds that nothing is what it seems, and the threads of murder extend far beyond the monastery to encompass some of the highest in the land.
You sat me down and made a case for matrimony and I told you you would be the first invited if I ever got married. I held your hand and listened as you described why you loved being married to Grandma all those years. You guys were a pair. Donning affection and arguing with equal passion and volume. You told me how sad you were that my parents divorced and how you were worried about my dad. At the time, you guys were still not getting along. I know he loved you and Grandma, but you guys were always so critical and righteous and crazy when it came to him. You guys constantly butted heads. I held his hand at your funeral. You, he and I haven't spent time together since I was a little girl. He had no idea that you and I were close. I think it made him so happy to know that you and I were close all those years he felt he had to keep his distance from you guys. At the funeral, dad kept saying to me with awe in his eyes "You really loved the old guy didn't you?" Of course I did. And I had no idea how much I would miss you and Grandma and your stories and lectures. No Idea.
I absolutely love taking pictures. I love photography in general. However, I have the hardest time photographing things as frequently as I would prefer. I love shooting people (with my camera), and I can really only take so many pictures of my husband, right? I love street photography, but I’m nervous about photographing strangers when I’m out by myself. Even though I live in Los Angeles (the land of paparazzi), I still feel like I would look like a creepy individual taking pictures of stranger. For whatever reason, I’m totally fine with it if I have at least one other person with me, however. Perhaps in my mind I can justify my actions by thinking I can’t look like a total creeper if I have a friend with me. After all, creepers don’t have friends, right? Obviously I have to be a safe, likable person since someone is voluntarily hanging out with me here. It’s really like having a visual character reference!
Throw all the vegetables onto a plate. I mean, arrange them neatly on an attractive platter. Yeah. That’s better.
I end up feeling awful.
I firmly believe that legislative change in relation to teen events could prevent the horrendous situations I’ve cited.
I get the impression that you're not comfortable with some of the injustices of wealth distribution. That some people have too much and others so little that they're starving. Is there something morally wrong about too much money?
I made quite a few changes to Alice Medrich's recipe, which you can find in the book, but here is my version, which I think is a little easier but loses none of the flavor or texture that makes these great.
It's been about three weeks since my last post - my bad! My mom and I were busy with gearing up with creating for the various craft shows we did in November - all three shows we did were new to us (although not new to that area). All in all, we did well this year - we've already booked our spaces for next year!
This may sound reactionary, but in fact it displays Scientific Socialism at its most exquisite. Capitalists require a professional police force to repress the workers and their annoying middle-class representatives, while feudal rulers intimidated, entertained and sometimes fed the cowled masses with spectacular public punishments.
Staring out into the pitch blackness, i let myself go. I hadnt listened to Michaels music for a long time. I had tried to shut it out. Now his voice was singing to me and it hit my heart with a blow.
Turns out we weren't.
Let’s start with the graphics. Yes this is the best looking game I’ve seen – the way the light falls and the smoke effects following explosions are fantastic. The whole game looks amazing and in particular the deaths of the Helghast stick long in the mind with their brilliant motion capture stumbles, slumping to the floor as their legs give way. There are quite a few different animations as well so it doesn’t get too repetitive.
There were no innovations or landmark achievements. There was a perpetual dearth of human creativity. It was not until the renaissance which heralded intellectual thinkers and groups such as the philosophers, Johannes Kepler, Galileo etc who challenged these religious dogmas and beliefs, that man began to realize his optimum potential. Mysticism was replaced with scientific inquiries and analysis. This gave birth to scientific and technological innovations, and subsequently the industrial revolution which has transformed the world.
will wonder, did a man so devoid of professional accomplishment beguile
Finally, the Board noted that the registered mark is entitled to a narrow scope of protection in light of various design and utility patents in evidence that suggest that such ornamental designs on fence rails are "nor particularly unique or unusual," and therefore that purchasers "would be accustomed to making distinctions based on more subtle differences in the marks."
My favorite of all the Douglas/Lancaster team ups and one of my fave films of the 60's, period! A tense, incredibly well-acted political drama with a brilliant screenplay by Rod Serling and masterful direction from John Frankenheimer. This one also gets my highest recommendation!
Right now on the Government propaganda broadcaster, the BBC, there is a debate as to whether chipping is a good thing, and of course the debate is rigged to be 100% favourable, with no dissent whatsoever. The only difference in opinion is as to how harshly the owners of those who do not take the chip should be punished. This is a serious issue, and one we dismiss at our peril. The microchip for people is on its way, and if we accept it, we are finished as free humans, and the agenda of turning us literally into cattle (Goyim) will be complete.
Yep, for excatly 2 years ago i started this wonderful hobby of ours. Yeah!
OTHER FIRMS' EXISTENCE HANGING ON A THREAD.
Catching Fire is incredibly successful at sucking the reader back into Collins' dystopian world, and although it plays on similar themes to The Hunger Games, including the continuation of the love triangle between Peeta, Gale and Katniss as well as a desperate attempt to survive the Hunger Games, it still manages to seems fresh and exciting. I did start to get tired of Katniss' wavering back and forth over who she loves more, Peeta or Gale, or if she even loves any of them. The Hunger Games is such a strong trilogy I really wish that Collins had relied slightly less on the love triangle aspect when telling the story. That said, Catching Fire is the perfect middle book for a trilogy; the characters grow, the plot thickens, and the reader is left knowing more but still eager to pick up the final book. In that sense it succeeds, but I was often left thinking that I wanted slightly more from the book; something I hadn't already experienced in The Hunger Games. What I found interesting was that although The Hunger Games works well as a standalone novel, Catching Fire makes the reader desperately want to pick up the next book in the series. Although I waited a month and a half patiently on the library wait list for Catching Fire, I immediately downloaded Mockingjay after finishing it.
A quiet taxi ride to H's (which is always a blessing) and a good time with J. H is feeling better (her allergies have been bothering her). And J is really improving in his reading. We had a nice time together, though I really had to pray that the Lord would help me leave the incidents at school behind. He answered my prayer and gave me the strength to encourage H and be completely attentive to J. There was road construction along the main route back home, so the taxi driver had to take the long way. Thankfully I was wearing my sunglasses and he couldn't ask me any questions. (I bought some new "Kurdish" sunglasses when I went to the market with T. Since wearing them, I've noticed that I don't get honked at or "nee-howed" wherever I go. The dark hair comes in handy!)
03 - Evenin'
And my favorite part...here's where we started with this wall :
It appears that despite the Tories pretending they have any interests of protecting British interests in Europe, he's going to cave in at the first hurdle.
Of his mind. And now nothing but snakes
This is all actually a surprisingly easy fix. Your company could be awesome. You're a small, family-run, sustainable, organic-gluten-wheat-free-biodegradable-all-that-fun-stuff energy bar company. I support that mission. Just remove the Native imagery, get rid of the cultural appropriation. Change your website, re-brand, and you'll be way more successful without 2% of the US population mad at you. Really.
this was my little Ellie, pulling around my old broken computer bag today...she pulled it all over the place...
Building an emotional bridge to our children while they’re young is a conscious thing we can do. This bridge can make the kind of connection that will serve us beautifully when our kids inevitably undergo their chameleon behavior as teenagers. They will likely leave us in the dust as they peel out of their childish past. But the emotional bridge work we do before that may, at least, allow us to stay in contact during the more serious events that will surely unfold.
MacDougall, Curry College
The thing about high-school is you have to get up everyday and GO. And because this is a drama, our leading lady is also a student at this school. The school band, Strawberry Fields is popular because of who they are. (Money? Nah, that would be cynical) An immediate, heated jealousy springs up between our boys and Strawberry Fields.
Learn from my lack of awareness, and my silly trusting nature. And here is the form... sent 5 months late, from the Sheffield Hallam Finance Directorate, who could not direct a leaf down a stream. Enjoy!
For our part, we only glimpsed some of the crowd as they returned peacefully up towards Bukit Bintang, some washing their eyes out with bottled water, but otherwise unscathed and unperturbed. And of course the constant noise from the helicopters circling overhead. In the papers the next day both sides blamed the other, of course.
If you can’t find something to love about every piece of art presented to you, you aren’t looking hard enough. Everything has some intrinsic merit and value. Focus on what is good about the art and tell your interlocutor. Be sincere. Tell them about the things you like about their work. If you are going to offer a suggestion for improvement, make that suggestion after you have praised the things you find great about the work. Do not be brutal. The only thing the person will hear is what you think is wrong with their work. That is why it is vitally important, having given them the benefit of your honesty and truth, to finish your assessment with more points about what you think is really good and positive about their art.
Another thing I should mention is that since scrapbooking is challenging for me, I perused Page Maps (here). This site has been a wonderful source of inspiration and sketch ideas. While I haven't used any one specific sketch, an image or impression would pop out and after some reflection, creating, and using what was available, I had my own design.
mixed greens with Granny Smith apples, crumbled smoked fontina and honey-nettle vinaigrette
I must tell you that the colors where so much brighter and almost eye searing in their intensity.
Civilized people need to stop acting like spoiled little children who toss themselves on the floor and throw tantrums because their mommies won’t give them ice cream.
Robinson and Bennett both deliver visceral, powerful performances, and Robinson especially is fantastic as this weak-willed man who finally sees an opportunity for happiness and pleasure in his miserable life, and grabs desperately and clumsily for it. Lang examines this dark comedy of exploitation and manipulation with a rigorous, cynical eye, his camera slowly tracking in and out, catching glimpses of the characters divided, from each other and within themselves, in segmented mirrors.
“Do you know what I hate”, she says. “I hate that pregnancy tests are so fucking happy. If it’s positive, you get a smiley face or a pink plus sign or, in my case, a giant YES with an exclamation mark. Don’t they think about the fact that half the people taking those tests don’t want exclamation marks?”
But I do know. I just put one foot in front of the other and keep going, no matter what.
1392 D-VIII/29(A)/2001. “Abraham Lincoln as a Lawyer.” Edward J. McFetridge American Inn of Court, Lincoln Program Pupilage Group, San Francisco, California.
Horribly Embarrassing Confession:
Turned out that her father was the owner of the little stallion and she introduced herself as Jenny.
Our permanent faculty figure stands at 14 and have had equal number of visiting scholars too who have contributed immensely to every student who is graduating from IWSB.
Though less overtly Thrashy than ‘Power Of The Damager’, this album sounds like Tommy Victor doing what he likes best without paying too much attention to what crowd he should please most with the material. The result is something that should appeal to both the Hardcore and Metal crowds of Prong. Also, the more melodic side of Prong is displayed passionately here, though with enough balls to not scare the crap out of longtime listeners.
Then you take out the dough, roll it into a rectangle about 8 x 14 or so, it doesn’t have to be exact. Then you brush it with the egg wash and sprinkle the cinnamon sugar over it. Starting at a short end, roll it up, pinch the edge of the dough into the loaf to keep it from unrolling. I also pinch closed the ends to keep them from leaking. I just push down at the end and squinch it shut.
We have a good crop of rhubarb already this year and I picked quite a little pile of it recently. I fancied doing something slightly different from the usual rhubarb crumble, but not too complicated as I didn’t have much time.
Of course there are many folks who would consider this a pseudo-connection, the illusion of a true contact between people. And in some ways it is true, there is no competition with actual face-to-face contact with others. But for years we have come to appreciate that other forms of connection are also valid in their own right. Letter writing, though all but extinct in today’s world, was and is a powerful way to connect with the people we know that live far away. I miss going to the mail box, sliding open the flap on an envelope and holding a card or letter in my hand written in ink from an old friend telling me how they have been or what they have been doing. The telephone which includes the newer portable cellular model (for better or worse) - provides a connection in real-time with those both far and near. As a coach, I use the phone (or Skype, it’s cyber-cousin) to work with my clients who live hundreds or even thousands of miles away and I have learned to tune my hearing to pick-up on subtle nuances in tone, breath and sound to connect as legitimately as if they were sitting across from me in my livingroom. But these new modalities also bring connections of a different sort that are in their own way increasingly important and valid.
The way I see it is that in my lifetime there is no way I could ever possibly run out of writing prompts. If I find myself saying that I cannot think of anything to write about, what I really should be admitting is that I'm too lazy or not motivated to write at this moment. Everything is a potential prompt for writing. You just have to use your imagination and ask some questions.
7) Korra is______
when we went off roading a few times? one time we went in your friend geo's truck with some other girls. and i got car sick. and then we were so far out, or maybe we were lost, but then we found a highway. there was only one problem... we were fenced in with what looked like a big cable. there is no untying that. so, good thing geo packs a giant pair of cable cutters in his tool box.
Dean Stockwell (Married to the Mob)
JA: I live for sharing joy; spreading tolerance, giving strength to people with my knowledge of well-being techniques. I love to dance.
6) I very rarely like pictures I take of myself anymore, but when playing with my new camera the other day I took a couple that didn't make me want to barf. So I thought I would share them with ya'll, since I disappear so often anymore it's doubtful ya'll remember what I look like!!
Our DT has come up trumps this month with some great designs as well as some more fab tutorials for you. Please click on the DT members name to go to their blog for more info on their cards. If it says that there is a tutorial, then please click on the piccie to be taken to that tutorial.
Haute Hippie.
I can block your phone from here.
Apparently this program must be applied for and approved in the first 90 days of my unemployment. I've now been unemployed almost seven months. Ahem. I raised my hand....
I started to feel like I had to lie down. Brenda had a look and I was trickling blood. Because of Lou’s speedy arrival my body didn’t realise there was no placenta inside any more so my body was still pumping blood to a placenta that was no longer there. I tried feeding Lou to help it slow down, but it didn’t work. Brenda asked me if I wanted to have the injection to slow it down. Sazz asked if I could lick or eat some of the placenta at this stage to slow the bleeding but I said “Injection! No placenta!”
If you are interested in these and other books about the Jewish experience, you'll definitely want to check out the blog tour to celebrate the Sydney Taylor Book Awards. Below is the full schedule:
Attraction is a pearly white that is streaky. If you can look past the streaks, this is actually rather pretty from a distance.
-Buddha (Hindu Prince Gautama Siddhartha, the founder of Buddhism, 563-483 B.C.)
Learned obedience through suffering,
Decorate the borders with almond shavings.
The fourth stage involved working the first stages of the island and the water surface. An underlying rule for paintings is that the closer the subject is to the viewer, the more the details need to be fleshed in and appear more realistic. The island and the water area are mid- to foreground and thus will need lots of work. Thus, this first foray into these areas really set the stage for further rework. Of course, it also forms the base for that rework so it has to be pretty solid in its right. Again, I chose to work this with wet-in-wet techniques to gain experience in this crucial discipline of Oil painting. As I mentioned before, it was the last time I could do this since the detail-building stages would require mostly-dry to dry paint surfaces.
Here’s the long and short of it. I started writing fiction (with illustrations) when I was in the first grade. I can still remember the story line for “The Fire Monster.” That experience, with all of it’s affirmation, planted a spark in my young psyche: writing was FUN! As I grew, tales and adventures blossomed in my mind. Virtually all genres caught my attention. I spent a lot of time telling my friends about my “one day” when they’d see one of my stories on a bookshelf. Dozens and dozens of partial stories followed…but no completed works. When my manuscript for “The Sheriff” was finished a bit over 7 years ago I had realized the first phase of a life-long dream: complete a book. It was time for the second phase: publishing.
A second world after the blackout’s done:
I can only imagine the emotional trauma inflicted on the little man of steel.
A big thanks for the love and support!
Scotland, The Brave
From this disturbing black and white imagery, we move to the bright sunlight of Spain and a happy British couple, Tom (Lewis Fiander) and Evelyn (Prunella Ransome). Evelyn is pregnant with their third child. They enjoy their time in a coastal city, but it's noisy and crowded, so they head off to the island Tom, a biologist, spent time on more than a decade before. The sunny happiness slowly gives way to sunny anxiety, until Tom and Evelyn discover the secret of the children. The last third or so of the film is thus all about their attempt to escape, and, naturally, that escape raises the title's question, since it's clear that the only way to escape is to kill some kids.
Ahh my jeffrey campbell lanas arrived... I've taken them out for a test drive and now I am planning to wear them everywhere so the leather get's that cool worn look... they should be fine, I hear the can take a beating or two..
Lilja's Sasquatch Stout
Think Positive
I now have a wonderful new human tenant who rescued a pitbull, and most recently an 8 mo old kitten named Nala. Meet Jessie and Louie….welcome to the neighborhood!
He showed it again when he latched unto rVp’s corner to flick the ball to Koscielny’s path. A second earlier and we would have been 1 up. Kos100%tackle missed by a lick of paint.
J--We're like Jack and Jill
I have a good laugh at the colloquial and now seemingly outdated turn of phrase Captain Munro has, with expressions like: "He's out to the wide," and, "They descended like swallows in the spring." When the Doctor and Liz first meet, Katie points out that Liz's sideburns match the Doctor's. We briefly discuss Pertwee's penchant for stunts and how even in his very first episode he gets a chase scene in a wheelchair. At the end of the first episode Katie is shocked that they shot the Doctor and compares it to when David Tennant's Doctor gets his arm cut off in his first adventure, The Christmas Invasion, noting, "If David Tennant can grow a new arm, Jon Pertwee can get shot and survive." Unfortunately the bullet only grazed him so we'll never know if he would have survived something more serious.
OP shows Ad Jd (High card, Ace)
When Caitlin, Ray, and Mariah moved in with me *temporarily, I told her she'd have to find new or *temporary homes for Puma and her Chihuahua Lola.
Hi again after a long time
easily enabling them to see behind them without relocating the torso.
Sadly, the Honorable Lorna Lockwood died in 1977 at the age of 74 due to complications of pneumonia (an awful disease, as I know from personal experience).
Mind you, sometimes I find the rule of three can be too predictable, especially in films. You just know the hero will try once, twice and then succeed on the third attempt. Yawn. However, perhaps this predictability was helpful when stories were told around the fire, hundreds of years ago. You need a clear story structure to follow a story told orally, and it also helps you to remember it for another night. This might be why three is also popular with stand-up comedians: Three men went into a bar; an Englishman, a Scotsman and an Irishman…
RIP another legend lost
"I tried to feel where she was shot, but I couldn't lift my head as they were shooting and I was scared they would hit me. I just kept my hand on the wound and hoped I was doing the right thing."
Oh Danny boy, oh Danny boy, I love you so.
Adding insult to the disconnect process is the 4 second push and hold required to shut down the VM605. 4 seconds seems insignificant to the guy sitting at his desk designing these things, but it’s an irritation that a simple toggle switch could mostly eliminate. Especially when getting in and out of the truck a dozen times a day.
How to Deal With Contractors (So You Won’t Lose Your Money Or Your Mind!)
It’s important that we understand more about autism because it impacts all of us. Almost everyone knows someone with autism, and it has an enormous impact on families, school systems, and communities. Whether you’re trying to understand your nephew or a child in your daughter’s class or you’re a businessperson trying to understand how to accommodate people with autism, autism touches your life – or it will soon. The economic impact of autism – which I use because it demonstrates how impactful autism is to families and communities, and money is easy to quantify — is now just beginning to be well-understood as well. The Autism Society of America estimates that it costs 3.5 to 5 million dollars to care for a child with autism over his lifetime; the United States spends almost $90 billion each year for autism. This figure includes research, health care, education, housing, transportation, etc.
I am so pleased with how these images turned out, and I share this with you so that you might know you can do it quite easily, too! Search for inspiration on the web, in books, and in magazines, and if you don't have a fancy edited program, find one on the net. I've heard picnik and gimp are good. But most importantly, have fun with it!
PDRM is lucky that we Rakyat of Malaysia are peace loving bunch, that only act when provoked and even then, all we do is run to safety and protect ourselves, they’re lucky we did not give them the treatment these football fans gave those police officers in the video above.
4. Consider your image. Before getting started, think about why you are using a particular site. What do you want to accomplish? This will help guide both the image you project and the types of people with whom you interact. I’ve been told by some that I’m too open and crazy with my social media but there is actually a method to my madness (basically, in the words of Groucho Marx, “I refuse to join any club that would have me as a member.”). Remember that anything you say on the ‘Net never EVER goes away.
I poured it from a bottle into the plastic cup they gave me. Oh well, it is an airport. Slight malt scent, amber color with a light cream colored full head. Head actually has some Lace. First thing I notice is the aftertaste, which as a a little bitter. High carbonation, light malt & hops, uberlight citrus. I'm actually thinking of water and earth. Medium to full bodied beer that is very wet. As my adventure with a damn plastic cup continues, the head sustains and pops in fine bubbes. But its nothing to write home about with drinkability due to high carbo. Damned if this isn't a Metallic feel in my mouth a few minutes after drinking it. As it warms up it's light caramel as it warms up. Not bad, butI can see why it could be popular in NO. Though they surprisingly don't have it on tap. And I do wonder how long you could stay in business in Houston without having some Shiner on tap. Oh my, there is something like biscuits in that last draught. Oh well. I did session this puppy in an attempt to knock myself out on the flight, which didn't work of course. I look forward to trying more Abita stuff as I continue travelling to NO.
* 1 cup quick cooking oats
They should have left it at that. But White House spokesman Jay Carney blurted out that the president was specifically referring to “the precedent under the Commerce Clause” regarding a legislature’s ability to address “challenges to our national economy.” Then the Harvard Law grad put his foot right back into his mouth:
Below, I leave you with a couple of Bloomberg interviews with Phil Angelides, who served as chairman of the Financial Crisis Inquiry Commission, discussing Greece, the eurozone crisis, the US recession, Occupy Wall Street protests and U.S. banking regulation. Listen carefully to Mr. Angelides, one of the few politicians that gets it and understands the limits of austerity.
The new body can be used now by introducing a point system. However, when you obtain the point from banner advertising, please be sure to peruse an advertising site.
By and large, I’m content with my bar gear—copper pans, strainers, funnels, a fancy-ass mandolin, zesters, shakers, two-liter jars for infusions, and an array German, French, and American knives deck the kitchen walls and cabinets. As the collection metastasizes into the living room, there are julep cups, brandy snifters, bottles for homemade bitters, cordials, and ratafias, and several shelves of cocktail books. Honestly, it’s more than anyone truly needs at home.
Last Friday we decorated our studio for the Christmas season. This year we decided to do a red, different silver textures with a subtle tartan theme a la fashion designer Vivienne Westwood & interior designer Scot Meacham Wood aka Mr.Tartanscot.
ALL BY MYSELF?
Dad's been "training" me. For what, I'm not sure, but he says the words "come" and "sit" a lot. When he took a break the other day, I decided to "train" him.
We will go until there’s no more to climb
Zimbabwe rejected the verdict, but a South African court in February ruled that it could be applied locally. The house in the Cape Town suburb of Kenilworth was not protected by diplomatic immunity and was legally attached or seized by the sheriff’s office on Tuesday.
Ok...It definitely came from the re-gift closet.
That morning I woke up to the smell of ham and eggs, a pre-game ritual on the weekend, and had an extra tinge of excitement nestled in my belly. Childhoods are made with those kinds of mornings. I took my ball and glove downstairs to the kitchen, rested them on the table and started to eat. My mother walked by the table and without stopping snatched the glove and ball, handed them to me, and asked me nicely not to use the the kitchen table as my personal locker. And while umpires were always fair game for back-talk, it was years later before I tried to pull that shit with my mother. I smiled at her as she brushed her hand through my hair and answered the phone.
When I was staying in Seletar, I found a creeper giving off a similar smell but my aunt told me that it is not the same plant. I was of course disappointed.
With my pen and paper in hand.
A trophy, to be presented by the Business and Enterprise Minister.
The Spanish Civil War - Hugh Thomas ( Penguin) 1983.
In September (roughly), we also switched churches. There were a lot of things going on at the one we had been attending and instead of taking a chance that we would get upset and say something out of anger, we left. We started attending Crossroads Baptist Church in Girard, KS and I have to say - wow! Talk about a man on fire for God! We absolutely love it there! The people are so friendly and we have already learned so much in the short time we've been there. We're so thankful God allowed us to find this church. In fact, Adam's parents have even started going there and really like it, too.
Chances are those in many areas don’t use mobile technology other than to make some emergency calls. Oh, but wait, the infographic does go on about how mobile phones are used, noting video, search, browsing, etc. It doesn’t even mention texting or calls.
“When we least expect it, life sets us a challenge to test our courage and willingness to change; at such a moment, there is no point in pretending that nothing has happened or in saying that we are not yet ready. The challenge will not wait. Life does not look back. A week is more than enough time for us to decide whether or not to accept our destiny.”
Generally, you will get at least 25% off for bulk orders. I was able to save so much more by purchasing wholesale unfinished wood bangles. It was also a good feeling knowing that I had enough supplies as the demand for my jewelry grew. At one point, I was selling over 50 hand painted bangles a month which was great but majority of my money went into buying the actual unfinished wood bangles.
6. Happy families are all alike; every unhappy family is unhappy in its own way. —Leo Tolstoy, Anna Karenina (1877; trans. Constance Garnett)
French showed up to one game with a whole bag of extra gear for Bruce Fish. He'd gone to a couple of local rinks and rooted through the lost and found. Everything was mismatched, but Bruce Fish looked pretty sharp with shin pads, gloves, Bruins socks, and proper skates.
Here are some of the great link-ups from last week. I had to trim my initial list to feature, it was getting too long!! :)
Some cat owners love this evidence that cats can pet their owners as well as be petted. On the other hand, kneading can be downright painful to people, because a cat’s claws are deﬁnitely out while kneading. Owners of declawed cats (including the author) ﬁnd kneading to be a perfectly painless and delightful aspect of cat ownership.
Sadly it was deemed "to difficult" by our group but I think it could have been relatively easy to execute, using the university hallways for the "unfamiliar place" and having the "unseen monster" simply be me holding the camera moving in a monstrous fashion, sure it might have been a little dark but that how I like it :).
Right after they went inside I knew that we needed to go in or I would have the baby outside. So we made our way inside and Kaye checked me. 7 cm. She started the tub and I got in. I just laid there and relaxed. I think I even went to sleep for a brief moment in between contractions. Jeremy rubbed my hand. I wanted to respond but I couldn’t, but having his support and knowing he was there was such a comfort.
He shook his head. I smiled at him, drunk with happiness, and feeling that my heart might just burst with joy.
* Listen to your favorite music
We first met Thembi in 2009. She joined the Hope2Africa Masi team and it didn’t take long for us to learn of her incredible story of faith and courage. Thembi had been sent to Masi by her mother in search of a better life for her younger siblings. She quickly became acquainted with Masi’s overcrowding and for over a year, her younger brother and younger sister and cousins were essentially homeless inside of Masi, living on the streets and fending for what food they could scrounge. They eventually found a shack they could rent.
Benway introduces each chapter with a journal entry as he counts down the days until he'll be free to go Far Far Away from the family to enjoy peace and quiet. He's examining cottages, planning a garden, searching for a replacement and getting ready for his tell-all book about the (which will finance said retirement) to debut. Only, life is never quiet at the Bellweather Lighthouse and chaotic adventures that SOMEONE must clean up after riot around his ears. Only when the children begin to realize that perhaps their much overworked but beloved butler might leave do they consider a change--only with the Bellweather children, change is never what one would consider quiet and normal.
PEOPLE: German director Michael Haneke brings us a scene-by-scene American remake of the exact same movie he made 10 years prior (Funny Games). But this time with Naomi Watts, Tim Roth, Michael Pitt, and Brady Corbet (who reminds me of Mcauley Caulkin a bit, and apparently was in 6 episodes of 24).
She takes the wheel, starts it up and pulls out and onto the highway...she's staying in her lane, she's whooping and hollering like a six year old who just had the training wheels removed...first merge is successful, first semi passes...it's her virgin voyage. You should see the smile on her face! I was too busy watching to remember to take pictures! We are now 25 miles outside of Williams and Mel is still going strong...it looks like rain ahead of us...Flagstaff turn off has light rain and Winslow is 57 more miles. Mel says, "Look Ma, no hands"...no flinching either! Holy moley! She did good...she'll do fine...she overcame her fears and really did a fine job...didn't even knock over any of those orange comes!
Winter is also upon us and get tips on how to stay warm and safe.
- Many of the action scenes contain choppy, poorly-edited sections that make them a bit difficult to follow.
We had many many lovely cards again entered in our challenge. Thank you all for participating. Our Top Three as chosen by our design team are:
Whenever I hear yet another person in my writing classes say “I know my book won’t earn me money, so I just write for myself and whatever happens, happens.” I always end up thinking, “Okay, thanks, you’re one less person in competition.”
And if you wish in longing gaze
The other reasons were basically the songs, our ability to play them, our attitude and “especially your singer”.
2. The bread represents the body of Christ
All in all, this was a wonderful book. If you’ve ever been one to associate smells with memories, this is the book to read. Rose also included wonderful quotes by Proust and Carl Jung that drew me in right from the beginning, and anything that includes the mysteries of ancient Egypt is bound to be a winner. Rose is quite a wonderful writer and I loved how she managed to tie everything together in the end.
8:00: I arrive and say hello to everyone, C has already been given his morning bottle
“No, no, full time, but she had an appointment, for something or other. I’m sure she told me, but you know how it is.”
The council also pointed out that Ms Parma is currently in a temporary residential place and it was always the case she would have to move on.
So to make a long story longer, we are about to head into our 3rd birthday this Saturday, May 7. We are getting so big (just hit the 30lb. mark for both of them. I know they are little for their ages...preemies). Alex loves balls and trucks right now, and Elle loves anything that tickles her fancy at the moment. Right now it is princesses. She was so excited to see the royal wedding and the beautiful princess, but was confused as to where the witch was. We love trains and Dora and dancing in front of the TV. They sure are fun!
—I've been halfheartedly covering up some of the other varieties of tomato plants that are still loaded with green tomatoes, but even during the summer their flavor was disappointing. I need to get back to starting my tomatoes from seed rather than having to rely on the meager (and boring) selection of plants available locally for sale.
And He is so gracious.
Most thistles are greatly beloved by bees and other pollinators.
Give me a hug
The parade also ended up being cancelled and a new parade called the Hollywood Santa Parade was initiated.
I remember things from when I was little. I told my mother that I swear I remember the green seats on the airplane back from Hawaii to the mainland. I told her once that I have a vivid memory of a bright circle of light in front of me and an ugly green upholstered seat back to my right and I’m laying down in the seat and can’t say or do anything. She says it’s just me remembering her telling a story about the trip when my family moved from Hawaii to Missouri and she flew with me while my dad was still getting out of the Navy. I don’t remember anything else from then until I opened my eyes after “making a wish” and blowing out the candle on my 3rd birthday cake. I remember that. I remember my brain saying, “We have to remember this. This is an important day.” It was like I’d switched-on a tape recorder in my brain and I have vague memories of doing that many times when my mind would believe that something was worth remembering. Not like things from school or grocery lists — just places and events that should stick with me for some reason.
First, the disappointing news: there's no indication that Mother's Day actually takes place on Mother's Day. One would not think that a single line of dialogue to that effect buried in one scene would have been such a big deal, but one would have been wrong.
The Customs Commissioner obviously had a different interpretation of Section 30(3). Normally such seizure orders under the IPR Import rules are done only when the complainant provides a surety that covers any possible damages to the defendant in the case of a wrongful seizure. In this case since the seizure was deemed as having no basis in the law, Dell was required to compensate the defendant for the losses suffered by them due to the seizure of their imports.
This morning, I learned that when I feel weary and burdened, I must translate my fear into trust.
Our heroine is a flight attendant named Blythe, who has taken this particular job despite severe phobia of heights (to the point where she has to pop pills to deal with it all). She finds herself in the midst of a highjacking in which her plane is directed toward a country that doesn't exist, and then she is living out her worst fear: tumbling through the sky without a parachute. Except she is rescued by a tall, handsome stranger named Zeyn. We learn of a shadowy government (or not) group that has goals all its own, and then, before long, the story plunges us into lost countries that appear on no maps, ancient Aztec artifacts, a new kind of engine that will revolutionize aviation, visions of a bird-snake named Quetzalcoatl, and a lot of ruminations on the nature of terrorism.
I hope everyone is having a good day. I had the chance to play a little more with my new machine and so far I have to say I love it! It cuts so nice:)
The palate was limey, steely and mineral with a tangy tangerine citrus fruit character and a really clean and pure feel.
Our modern culture (what the New Testaments calls “the world”) seems to have disjoined EROS from marriage and the other three “loves.” Sexual desire is promoted in our entertainment and we are bombarded with visual images that seem to be designed to arouse us to lust. Sexual union outside of marriage is considered the norm, while marital sex is often seen as at best a continuation of the same “recreational” activity. There appears to be a disconnect between love and sex. I have been told by some (even Christians) that they see no connection between the two. I guess having sex (what used to be called “making love”) is simply a fun thing for a couple to do together, like playing tennis or bicycling.
So you may have noticed that my blog has been quiet for a few days. If you didn't know, I've been at Blissdom in Nashville, and I have a ton to say about it, but I'm still recovering. You don't want to see the laundry pile I have yet to complete. Before I left, however, I made a special treat to share while I was at Blissdom.
Through the wave that runs for ever
GSM Quad Band: 850/900/1800/1900 MHz
beef kimbap: add ground beef cooked with some soy sauce
So I made an appointment with the Lorna, my local Smoking Cessation specialist who after a chat took a measurement of my carbon monoxide level. I knew it wasn’t going to be good when the lights kept going and going up the side of the gauge! I can’t remember what the reading was, what I do remember is that I was 10 times the level at which they have to evacuate schools! As a farther of 3, this really hit me, in fact, when I got back in my car (and yes, lit another cigarette) I was actually quite emotional. It doesn’t matter how careful you are to not smoke around your kids, just giving them a cuddle afterwards your still affecting them. Anyway, I’ve jumped ahead a little, once we had established my breath was as toxic as a car exhaust (my words, not Lorna’s) we decided that I would start a course of Champix.
This is partly the point. Delores is not so much an individual as a representation of an idea—in this case, an unsavoury one, too prominent in silent-era filmmaking. She is the virgin to be protected: Caucasian, Christian; unbowed through faith. Delores symbolizes what we fight for, no matter who’s fighting us or why. She’s a treasure of limitless value, if you’re feeling poetic enough to say so. But her value can be measured. “The fairest gem of the Occident,” declares one appraiser in Old San Francisco.
COLL-C 100 (33349), Introductory Indonesian, 4 cr
Any advice?
I don’t wear contact lenses, and apparently my eyes are more than a 20/20 vision. In other words, I was utterly useless in the study, but I went in and got my ten bucks anyways.
I want to talk for a minute about what that means.
The only cereal I would eat were Rice Krispies and Corn Flakes. And they didn’t taste good without sugar. I’m surprised I ate Rice Krispies. I hate rice. Rice as a breakfast food sounds disgusting. But, not when you have three fantastic characters giving me their “Snap, Crackle, Pop” routine. What a fun cereal to eat.
Veteran music commentator, Paul Gambaccini, has today been questioned by police in connection with the deaths of Whitney Houston, and all other recently deceased pop musicians and singers.
by PF Louis
We also have to throw into the pot the fact that people will be losing a well-used public open space that has been used in some cases for 20 years or more! This loss of public amenity is very important, although it isn’t deemed very important by most of the supporters of the application because they don’t live here. Presumably they already have their own local areas where they can go for walks etc.
We had trusted, then they lied.
A woman standing near me already had the book and was very enthusiastic about Jeni's method. "The base is very versatile. Very neutral in flavor," she enthused.
Having performed his duty and tied up Greece , continued the work of GeorgePapandreou , cutting salaries and pensions , putting taxes , abolishing labor rights and killing Greeks.
are all bound together.
This is one of a spate of Digital Reef announcements recently. Two press releases came out at the end of January, one announcing closer integration with Relativity and one about Digital Reef’s new predictive priority functionality. I knew about the latter – indeed I am quoted in the press release – but announcements made once LegalTech has started tend to get overwhelmed by everything happening at the show and in its aftermath (I still have one panel to report on, and want to come back to the one new application which I actually saw in New York).
But then, a reporter from ANOTHER NPR show, Marketplace, an "Old China Hand' thought there were some things in the report that didn't add up. Yes, there were worked injured by hexane, but they were in a plant far away from the ones Daisey visited. The idea of unionists meeting in a Starbucks sounded odd. So this journalist started digging. He found the interpreter, the one Daisey said could not be located. It turns out she did have the same name as Daisey had reported. And she disagreed with a lot of the interactions that Daisy claimed to have with the workers.
C. "Honey... honey? where did he go..."
"Moooom!" My son freaked out. "You're so embarrassing."
Maragos said it is worth highlighting that “in all presentation forms, the county’s overall financial condition has improved, including two successive years of budgetary surpluses during the Mangano administration. The Mangano administration, working cooperatively with NIFA, was able to deliver the 2011 budgetary surplus by reducing departmental costs, controlling expenses, imposing a hiring freeze, and reducing borrowing and related debt service costs.”
Age: 46 years old
Recent events, however, have revealed a better target for implementing the Rooney Rule: advertisers. After all, clients risk greater potential losses from negative publicity. Additionally, these companies have clearly contributed to the lack of diversity on Madison Avenue by engaging in Corporate Cultural Collusion.
* Create a new project using the posted theme. A layout, card, ATC, home decor item, hair bow, or anything your can think of.
the constant "in your face helpfulness"
Spencer has also started going to sleep earlier at night. Now instead of going to bed around 10:00 he is going down between 8:30 and 9:00. It has been such a blessing for his momma, it give me a few minutes before bed to myself :)
I get many emails from performers visiting NYC who are interested in getting booked so I've compiled some of the best and worst practices I've seen and in doing so I hope this will provide some tips for anyone who is seeking for future bookings.
Somewhere along the line, I bought this Calico Critters Nursery School for Emma, put it in a safe place so I would know where it was, then completely forgot about it. (Perhaps that's indicative of the mental fogginess my doctor asked about, ha ha.) When I found it a few days before Easter, I decided to give it to her. Not sure she liked it, though.
rope bell dinglin'
Robbery 12.0 31.2
He knew what I needed.
10. Dead Memories
Annette Curtis Klause was born in England and came to the U.S. as a teenager bringing her warped imagination with her. She has published four novels and several short stories in an attempt to rid herself of her demons. Apparently it's not working, so she'll just have to keep on writing.
Second course will be Hacker-Pschorr Edenhall Lager paired with Meyer's Sausage: Smoked Elgin sausage served with cheese and onion perogies.
When it comes to having a variety of comedians to choose from, some agencies fall short. That they offer the best in entertainment, but in the end all they offer is a very short list of available entertainers that you can choose from. You do not have to settle for this kind of service from your corporate event entertainment company, you can have options and you can choose from a long list of very good entertainers that your company will love to have at their event.
And to him who orders his conduct aright
Let’s face it, we all have that one particular team (or two, or twelve) whose fans we can’t stand. Most of these feelings are based along rivalry lines (Giants/Eagles, Redskins/Cowboys, Chiefs/Raiders, Jets/Dolphins, Steelers/Browns/Ravens, Saints/Falcons, etc.). We lump them into groups, hate them because we think they are arrogant, cocky, ignorant, self-hating, or self-serving. We all do tend to think that our cause is the most righteous. There’s nothing wrong with that; it’s part of fandom. What I’m talking about here are the annoying behaviors that make football fans look like Cletus the slack-jawed yokel. These are behaviors that have to go.
St. Valentine designed by Jenny Hoffman stitched on 28ct. linen over 1 thread so the stitching is tiny. I've also primitively stitched around all edges. Measures 5 x 4 inches and is $20.00 which includes shipping.
14. I still have a $200 post-dated check that my mechanic will cash on the first and a $100 check that The Good Ex will cash tomorrow coming out of tomorrow’s paycheck, but…
Most women with gestational diabetes won't experience any symptoms, so the only way to know is to get tested. Anymore it is a standard part of prenatal care. As for the cause, it's mostly genetic. Partially the genetics of the mother and partially of the father, as the placenta that is producing the hormone is a combination of the parents just like the baby. The only things that the mother can control to help prevent or minimize GD is to keep her weight, blood pressure and cholesterol in a healthy range. Also not smoking, but you already knew you weren't supposed to do that while pregnant.
That's when Hene Kelly, a progressive stalwart and self-described "den mother" for the newcomers, told school board member Hydra Mendoza - who was trying to calm everybody down - to shut up and wagged her finger. Then, Kelly upturned her chair (she says that was out of sheer clumsiness) and stormed out of the room with the newcomers, Wendy Aragon and Kelly Dwyer.
to themselves, pawns in a game they simply refuse to understand, at least in most cases. The stance of AAWR is really quite clear, Islam per-se is not a threat to this country, it is merely a religious belief system, it is unfettered immigration that is a threat, treacherous government and the money-powers hold over our nation state.
This act made Washington a "Rome on the Potomac." The 14th Amendment was now in place (1868). The Federal Republic had been converted into an Empire. By 1873 with the Slaughterhouse cases, the Supreme Court had ruled that the "privileges and immunities" of 14th Amendment citizenship "did not include Common Law rights," later defined as the "Bill of Rights" in Maxwell v. Dow (1899). By 1900 Rome took this country and kept it, James Cardinal Gibbons being the first American Pope. He ruled every president from Grover Cleveland to Warren Harding.
For the metall theme I used some golden heat embossing to distress the edges, the new thing included are my new Copic markers that I used for coloring.
A bit of a one hit wonder, O-Town’s life was a flash in the pan as far as music history is concerned. On the map of my adolescent life they weren’t as influential as some other boy band groups. They were, however, oh so cute! I diligently read the interviews of all the bands in hopes that someday, somehow, if I had the chance to talk to them I’d say something clever about something they liked and we would fall MADLY in love.
Do you other junkers/bloggers have 3 arms or something?! Or maybe a camera on your head, I just don't see it.
I suppose you're expecting me to pick that lot apart, aren't you? Reveal the fascinating facts you might have overlooked. But it's just after christmas and I'm feeling lazy.
If I start thinking negatively...there goes my whole outlook on the day...
Sketch the moon when it’s dark for good contrast.
The answers to the plot's mystery can be taken simply and solely from Davis's famous confession: "With all my heart, I still love the man I killed!" Or, like all other great movies, you can look closer and find a great deal more. Almost the whole of Wyler's movie measures up to that justly famous beginning, the images locked together like the pattern in Leslie Crosbie's lacework, yet it isn't the least bit overbearing or didactic. The Letter entertains and involves as the plot winds closer and closer around Leslie Crosbie.
“Passing by the good/ I encountered the jeep/we had to give way/for size and siren gave hint/
* the original recipe calls for 3 apples, but I (as well as my family) found that it just wasn’t enough. We could barely tell that the apples were there. So now I use up to 5.
Normally I don't use dish soap on any beer equipment but after brewing with the chocolate - I used a 62% Cacao ScharffenBerger bar this time - every thing gets a bit oily. The cocoa butter comes out first in the primary fermentation and floats like butter on the top. I scoop as much as I can off the top when racking and try to leave most behind. By the time it gets to the keg, most of the oils are gone. In previous kegs, it seems that oils stick to the sides and as you drink it down, the beer gets better head retention.
Edith also offers her clients decorative accessories and antique furniture, but the emphasis remains on designing and window treatment and everything related to what could be created with fabrics. Edith even designs her own custom-made collection of seating furniture.
Then comes the story I’m working on now. I originally thought it was an action adventure story set in the future. Some of the action scenes are glorious! But there was something about the story that I couldn’t quite figure out, so I just put it aside. About a year later I had read a novel by Ashley Fontainne and I realized that it was her style of writing that the story needed. She had done a book giveaway for me and worked pretty damn hard to help me promote my book that weekend. I also had the opportunity to see just how much of herself she put into promoting her own work. Afterwards I wanted to thank her for what she had done for me and had no real idea as to how I would do that. The only thing I could think of was to ask her if she would want anything to do with the story idea that I had. I was really surprised when she accepted my offer.
The cupcake was then sprinkled with Maldon salt—as are many of Pichet’s desserts. His philosophy? “When you add salt, your mouth is watering and you can taste everything a little more.”
Why is this on PPV, yet we don’t get a Tag Title Match? If you wanted to get Ryback on PPV why not throw him out there with Tatsu or Riley or someone who’s a name at least. This is Lawler’s first time seeing Ryback I bet, since he doesn’t watch Smackdown.The crowd has no interest in this match, and I can’t blame them. Ryback kills the one kid and forces the other one in the ring to crush him as well. The crowd is chanting Goldberg, which is hilarious, as Ryback finishes the scrubs with ease for another win.The crowd pop was not for the match but the fact that it’s over. Khali and Santino enjoyed the match more then the crowd did.
I am hoping that if we stock up on these miles we’ll be able to use them for plane tickets somewhere late in our trip or to splurge on a night or two in a great hotel when we really need it. So we’ll keep on using the card whenever we can.
Click on the pic below to download.
Under the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration’s new rating system, all vehicles are given a single rating of one to five stars based on their scores in seperate front and side impact tests as well as resistance to rollovers.
Shichirōji: Yes!
The palate was soft and lightly textured with fleshy, succulent nectarine fruit balanced by just enough acidity to keep it fresh and lively. A touch of minerality kept it lively too
It’s bad enough to be governed by 5-4 decisions written by liberal judicial activists. In the case of “anchor babies,” America is being governed by Brennan’s 1982 footnote.
Dr.
Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows Part 2
Okay, people. I’m in a veggie slump. One of the staples of my healthier eating has been tons of fresh veggies, prepared by me at home where I can control the amount of salt, butter, etc. that goes on or in the food I prepare.
She was so excited for the Christmas dance. Grace had tried to bail, but she wouldn’t let her unsupportive friend (and potential sister-in-law?) get in the way of her happiness.
Today’s post is definitely going to be one of my favorites! I have honestly been waiting for this since I was a kid loving The Jetsons on Cartoon Network!
The aim of this campaign is on how good health throughout life can help older men and women lead full and productive lives and be a resource for their families and communities.
Because much of what I write is topical satire, I read two newspapers a day, seven days a week, plus a couple of weeklies on the weekend. I also try to read general interest newsmagazines when I can. When I added a large dose of science fiction to the mix, I bought subscriptions to Scientific American and Scientific American Mind (although there is a lot of science news in newspapers).
Go forth, good soul!
This oven method, of cooking eggs in the shell, is not only fool proof, but the eggs come out absolutely perfect and you can make a ba-jillion at once!!
Key Largo, Montego baby why don't we go
ace frehley 355
Within the darkness
The queen would have been happier,
It is important to remember that Thessalonians is not book, but a letter. Who is the letter from? To whom is the letter written?
M: Any other strange beasts in the mix?
I spend useful Diary time scanning other Blogs I Like, few of which have been updated on my list yet. They all seem so full of incredibly interesting facts, links and lives and pictures that my own blogwords - such as "did laundry" - don't quite wash.
* That you think, despite the above, this sounds interesting and fun!
I’d love to say that I don’t think the Brits will go that far, but I’m a little short of faith these days.
* TV6 Board of Directors being called in for questioning on the Crime Watch Rape tape.
The Almond Shower Oil is also a wonderful product to use for shaving your legs. The razor glides so smoothly over my skin, leaving it indescribably soft afterwards. I didn't experience any irritation at all which is really good. The Almond Shower Oil is suitable for both men and women.
Yesterday the JSC failed to rule whether the Constitutional Court or Judge Hlophe had cases to answer. The JSC said it could not decide whether there were cases to answer until they had heard oral evidence from both sides.
What do you call it when three-quarters of your potential customers want something, but only 4 percent get it?
“I’m sorry, Glorianna,” he’d said. “It’s not good. It’s spread to your lungs and liver very fast.” She wasn’t surprised, and had said so. Her breathing hadn’t felt right for a while now, and even the kids had noticed the yellow eyes. She’d joked about eating too much custard, but they weren’t stupid. Not her kids. Then he’d dropped the bombshell of hope.
Do keep this in mind that: KEEPING YOURSELF CLEAN IS THE MAIN KEY! But it's not like I'm dirty, but trust me, it helps.
My project went up on their blog TODAY!! :)
This week has been an unfortunate reminder of why we have puke rules in our house. The rules are pretty simple and have been drilled into my kids. Even my 6 year old can quote them back to me. Thankfully, so far this week, all puking kids have abided by the rules. Unfortunately, because of a surprise stomach bug, #3 had to use rule number 4 – leaving a large spot in our upstairs hallway for me to shampoo.
Chance On Guard
On a lighter note, here’s the rest of the museum: an assortment of random, interesting sex-related things with no deeper meaning whatsoever. Like one-night stands!
So today, with nothing but time and a repressed desire to see justice served, I pulled up to that split and parked my car in the safety zone between the actual road and the ramp. Then I got out, put my safety vest on, and began targeting those cars that were passing all of the waiting motorists and trying to cut in. It didn't take but a few seconds to spot the first one whipping across the beginning of the safety zone. I pointed to the driver, and when he made eye contact with me, I waved him right back out of line, told him that I could either cite him for crossing a safety zone ($150) or else he could get back on the surface road that he'd cut in from. He got back on the road and drove off, and I was loudly thanked by the drivers of two of the next three cars that came by--cars that he'd just cut right in front of because he was (in his mind) more important than them.
Updated: Sunday, April 8, 2012, 2:34 p.m.
Hollyoaks: Kim Tiddy (Heidi Costello)
(General Najiya exits at the left side of the stage while Imtithal, Saameira and Maisa exit at the right side of the stage.
I think we are over-saturated by now with Beit Shemesh. However, I do have to post one more piece (h/t Life in Israel) that just came my way. The piece below will probably not shock people so much as reveal the sadness of how some in rabbinic positions respond to sickening and traumatic events. I am glad there are people out there making sure these words are not allowed to stand.
Thank you for the visit!
We do the whole shake-hands, hi-nice-to-meet-you thing and then we kind of just stand there, the three of us. We asked each other a few questions, it was kind of awkward because
This is Izzy's first road trip with the family and she was a real trooper on the way down, although the traveling did get a little wearisome on the way.
Chael’s Ale IPA – As you all know Super Dave is FatCat’s resident IPA fanatic. It would be rude for us not to throw a little IPA his way. Well hold on kids here it comes. This IPA will be a beast. I’m keeping my gravity within the IPA guidelines at about 7.5% ABV but I’m busting through the IBU ceiling. We tried the Green Flash West Coast IPA in one of our shootouts and it was BITTER. This was our guiding light for bitterness in this brew because anything more bitter than that would be downright unpalatable. Blasting to 91.7 IBUs, Chael’s Ale should have very pronounced bitterness without being completely ridiculous (or so we hope). We’ll be using Citra, Centennial, Chinook, and Sorachi Ace hops. Did I ever tell you how much I love homebrewing? Good luck finding a commercial brew with all of those different hops in it. Stay tuned for the carnage!
deep beneath the fine, red dirt -
For the worldview of Cheney and Netanyahu to prevail, Obama must be defeated. That is clearly the agenda of the current Israeli government, and what the NYT delicately but accurately calls "Israel's backers" in the US.
The point is that in our every day life, our children are a gift. Incredible gifts that root out the selfishness in my heart and remind me just how much I need God's grace daily. So why would we be open to what God might call us to regarding our family? For sure, some would call us nutso to commit to an orphan when our youngest child was 4 months old and then add to our family again not even a year after our newly adopted son has been home! SURPRISE if you didn't already know that Kramer Baby #5 is due August 4, 2012!!! ( I just teared up writing that...such a sap:) I then began looking through our family photos and realized how I was smiling and audibly laughing at pictures of our kids. The memories of just the past few months racing through my mind, making me chuckle and reminisce. I thought "This is it! This is why we are okay with the stress and 'work'...they truly bring us so much joy!" And these pictures are just a very small sample of the "memorables" and "importants" over the past months.
baby thinking how uncomfortable that would be. My contractions were so strong- and I got to that point that we all get to and say “I can’t do it anymore- this is too intense”. I’m not afraid to say that with all 3 I have been brought to that point- and the triumph that comes after when you recognize the strength of your body and you do it.
So then you’re all like, “But what if I already have a bunch of stuff to carry in, like bags of groceries?” And I’d go, “Big whoop. No excuses.” Take your groceries in, then come back out to do a check of the car’s interior, making sure you haven’t left any stray boogers lying around. Alternatively, you can combine the two steps into one by throwing whatever items have been temporarily added to the car into your grocery bags. When you unload the bags inside, you’ll put those things where they belong, even if it’s the trash.
and glides by
Did you at least blush when you realized what you had done?
When BB was about three, the Easter Bunny left him a note in his Easter Basket. I don’t remember what the note said, but it was probably along the lines of:
Dip each breast in the egg mixture and then roll in the buttered panko. Gently place each breast on a baking sheet, sealed-side down, and bake in 350 degree oven until golden brown, approximately 15-20 minutes, until the internal temperature reaches 165 degrees F. Serve hot.
All done! Now the kids have a place to hang their own stuff by the door. It's a right above the shoe bin (which changed my life, by the way) and under the "stuff I need to take with me but I don't want the kids touching it before we leave the house" storage thingy.
He knew what he was doing
One moment in timelessness, the Soul decided to add the experience of life on Earth into its immortal journey. It was born a princess, with every opportunity and blessing imaginable.
Flavouring for this dish is really simple, just some chopped garlic, spring onion and a little cooking wine. The only seasoning is just salt and some sugar to balance the tomato. If you find just salt is lacking flavour you can add a touch of light soy or fish sauce. I like mine simple.
Yep, fabric, tied up with ribbon, both of which will end up being recycled. Thanks for my cute cushion cover Jeanette, I love it.
He considers it critically important that YA writers don’t dumb down to their audience or try to reach the teens’ level through slang, “teen language” and styles (which are, in any event, transitory). The important thing is to reach what is inside a person. As it is this which is timeless and the same for all of us, young and old alike. The same holds true for the dynamics in relationships. And it is to these sorts of levels to which stories must be told. This is why Kevin says he sees himself writing about teens rather than for teens.
- 1 1/4 c. bread flour
So I've meditated and thought on this question taking into account changes in my own life, my loves, my past relationships and my current ones and even those yet to come. I've come to some conclusions that ring true for me.
Christ Jesus, before ascending into heaven, You promised to send the Holy Spirit to Your apostles and disciples. Grant that the same Spirit may perfect in our lives the work of Your grace and love. Grant us the Spirit of Fear Of The Lord that we may be filled with a loving reverence toward You. the Spirit of Piety that we may find peace and fulfillment in the service of God while serving others; the Spirit of Fortitude that we may bear our cross with You and, with courage, overcome the obstacles that interfere with our salvation; the Spirit of Knowledge that we may know You and know ourselves and grow in holiness; the Spirit of Understanding to enlighten our minds with the light of Your truth; the Spirit of Counsel that we may choose the surest way of doing Your will, seeking first the Kingdom; Grant us the Spirit of Wisdom that we may aspire to the things that last forever; Teach us to be Your faithful disciples and animate us in every way with Your Spirit.
I used a set from Flourishes called From The Desk Of. I love the pretty vase of flowers and old Calligraphy pen. I have not used this image before because it tends to be on the bigger side and every time I have tried to use it, I have not found a way to incorporate it without it taking over the whole card. So I basically cut around it leaving the white inside. I am not the best with a craft knife, so I don't even go there! Papers are a combo of MME and card stock is Stampin' Up for the brown and PTI for the Kraft.
- Child+adult sexual relationships
But I guess that's to be expected, my blogging habits have been sporadic which is no way to cover the Brooklyn Spring just concluded, in which I saw more than a few new businesses blossom.
A brilliant young scientist and one of the first humans born on Venus, Arik works tirelessly to perfect the science of artificial photosynthesis, a project crucial to the future of his home, V1. The colony was built on the harsh Venusian surface by the Founders, the first humans to establish a permanent extraterrestrial settlement. Arik’s research becomes critical when he awakens from an unexplained, near-fatal accident and learns that his wife is three months pregnant. Unless Arik’s research uncovers a groundbreaking discovery, V1’s oxygen supply will not be able to support the increase in population that his baby represents.
and an 800-metre race in Cayman Brac on Saturday.
10) Sunday became the primary day of worship for these believers;
If you want to add some extra protein to your smoothie, mix in a scoop of protein powder and its a great post workout snack. I prefer to mix the milk, OJ and powder by itself before adding the fruit because I think it gets rid of the grittiness that can sometimes result from adding protein powder to things.
07. Riflessione (02:03)
The brakes, the gas mileage,
Izzy’s mom laughed as if Marian had made a joke. “You know you’re more than welcome to join us for dinner, if you like.”
06/23 – Baltimore, MD @ Sonar
You made me didn’t you?
If VW had expressed interest in Proton five years ago, surely it has some ideas on how to turn the company around. Was it even approached now?
I have successfully published different types of media (Video, Image, Text, Audio) to Facebook, Twitter, YouTube, Flickr, blogs, business websites and various other platforms. But not for the purposes of this project apart from initial blog posts and questions in relevant forums.
You've got a point. But no... Let me help you out. What's 4x6, comes in your mailbox and causes me great fits of angina every year?
Benito’s
We are to put off the old self, which belonged to your old self.
Abus de Confiance (France…Henri Decoin)
Monty Python’s The Meaning of Life was released in 1983. Great year 1983, that was the year that I graduated from High School.
Malls
I really liked the challenge of recreating the delicate side lighting around her glasses (and barely-visible shoulder) from the photo ref here so much, and it turned out so well, that I went further later on with AW-025 which gave me even more opportunity to paint that effect.
She did eventually show up (30 minutes late!), and I did learn how to make a Monotype. That's pretty much all we had time for. So, I didn't learn much, but it's a step in the right direction. Maybe by the time I'm 50 I'll be a printmaking expert? It was fun to get my creative juices going again. A person should never stop learning, after all. (As you probably guessed by the "Part 1", I did another new thing in December. That one needs its own post, so stay tuned for that).
The phone just rang.
Then Friday, more stomach aches from Ella. Then Wyatt joined in with complaints of his own.
Seit Citrus Kick - Key lime, Clementine
He thinks there is too much of the camera, not enough of me in them. i.e he believes the reason I like them so much is not because of subject or content, but the fisheye and xpro effects. And that these belong to the camera, and not to me. He thinks they get in the way of his enjoyment of the picture, that they're like a barrier between him and what he otherwise would have felt when he looked at the pictures.
I’ve learned that the blog is not something to be feared, but rather an engaging medium through which I can write in my own voice and engage a very different audience from that I am used to.
Yours is the Earth and everything that’s in it,
No, it is not.
It's time for a new challenge at Hanna and Friends.This week we ask you to alter something,doesn't matter what,just add a cute image,some papers and embellies and join us for the chance to win a fab prize.
With the evolution of our hyper obsessed, media driven society. It truly is hard to believe anyone’s appearance is real anymore, on-line or in real life (is there even a difference now?). Call us crazy or old-fashioned but we like to believe that there are areas of our lives that will remain free from this growing trend in our society. In the end, “WE” understand it’s not really possible to enrich/enhance who we are as individuals without working on ourselves from the inside out, or without authentic hard work.
Some critics of the marriage plan, such as writer Ayisha Osori, argue that its great flaw is in giving false hope of success in marriage to women when society’s views of wives remain problematic.
3/4 cup of butter, room temperature
He also continues to be preternaturally good at getting into complex ideas about people. Tolstoy examines human relationships, positions of power, avoidance, and how people go about just coasting along, and almost all of it is applicable to how we live our lives now. (The one exception may be his handling of doctors, but that’s a profession that has changed immensely since the 1880s.) Most people will find some of themselves in Ivan and, though he isn’t a bad person, will be kind of disappointed by that.
Nikasaur: Only if you say it for me.
This is how you figure out which planet is the lord of which house. It is fundamentally important to know which planet owns which houses. For understanding the results of a house in a chart, the owner of that house is as important as the house itself!
GC1V64K
Down in TX, Region 1 and 2 are really heating up. Cedar Park, The Woodlands and Klein Oak all make Region 2 the toughest Team region in the State, if not the US.
By the way, J Crew has restocked these little gems, so they are back down to their $68 price tag instead of the $150 they were selling for on Ebay (don't worry, I was just stalking them for research purposes (c: )!
Now for super duper exciting news!!! It is my Green Week! I have some great green product reviews and giveaways starting later today! I am very excited about this!
This isn’t even yet about the BDSM, all this is just basic craftsmanship of a writer.
“Nonsense. It’s my pleasure,” he assured her as he stood up and shuffled around so that in an instant they’d swapped places and the pregnant woman found herself with her bottom right in front of a vacant seat.
All solved!
You can stay there today. Really. This one is not a ruin, and it's on my wish list for a Pendragon Legacy event... or, if the books sell well enough, maybe I'll book a night or two there to celebrate the end of the series!
Sun 9/28 New Haven, CT Toad's Place
Be the strong man who won the elections and take a tough stand where needed.
TY: Knowing what you know now pass along what you feel is a key piece of advice.
“You mustn’t touch things like bird shit, pigeon shit,” my friend said, “because they have all those illnesses that are very bad for you and kill you.”
The show itself was a bust. Very few people turned out on Saturday, from what I was told, and Sunday was worse. The less said, the better.
P.S. someone is going to New York City with a group of gal pals...she is just a little bit giddy about it!
You spoke a kind word to me
I rebelled against this album. When everyone calls it the best R.E.M. album of the year when R.E.M. releases an album, I get my back up. The truth is, the Decemberists indeed our R.E.M. R.E.M. this year. This incredible track, though, evokes more Tom Petty circa “You Don’t Know How It Feels”, which is probably why it’s my favourite song on what turned out to be a pretty incredible album. I really have to let go of my hate for these bands.
With bad, comes good.
Red Bull has a 112 point lead over McLaren in the Constructor’s Championship, and Sebastian Vettel has a 77 point lead over Mark Webber, and a 82 point lead over Lewis Hamilton. It’s possible that those leads can disappear, but highly unlikely. There have been a few hiccups for Red Bull over the past two races, but it’s nothing for the Austrian-based team to worry about.
Plenty of really cool memoirs here, all that revolve around 25 of Hip-Hop's most undeniably classic Hip-Hop LP's...
Here's a tip if ever you fear someone is getting their scam on: go to Google, and type in the name of the offering/service/business and then the word 'scam.' It opens up a whole new world. Likewise, if you want to find out what the critics say about any particular product, do a search for the product name plus the word 'sucks' - you are guaranteed to get the scoop, along with some ... colorful language.
"The Crystal Gazer"
seems like things never stop going wrong but that’s life I suppose.
2. Dana at Reliving Tomorrow ... Dana is an amazing crafter and a super lady, sweetness to the core! You MUST check out her blog, she is SO gifted!
The other day, I woke up on the wrong side of the bed. I rolled out of bed at odds with the world and didn’t really know why. Maybe I didn’t sleep well or maybe there was something weighing on the back of my mind, but it really felt like there was no identifiable reason at all. Do you ever get like that?
It is almost impossible not to step on a duck,
Smoke gray eyes heated and sharpened like lightning. “Oh, I can back it up.”
“Things like driving a sports car, I know British aristocrats are not that arrogant,” he said. “Real aristocrats absolutely don’t do that, but are relatively low-key.”
Research suggests that compounds found in magnolia bark may have mild antibacterial and antifungal properties. These studies are in their preliminary stages, however, and have been limited to test tube research.
Monarchs (including all the Tudors)! Pirates! Shakespeare! These are really nice quality, and if you start giving a friend one or two each year, you won't have to think about what to get them again for a decade.
Firstly, the reader left no name or return email address. It was an anonymous drive-by. I’ve posted nearly 325 blog posts in the past couple years, averaging a post every three days or so when you jostle the numbers, which when you consider the fact that I have a full-time day job and only get to write a few hours a week isn’t too shabby. I don’t get paid to do this blog. I’m not a professional writer, although I’d dearly love to get paid to do what I’m doing. Anyways, in those 325+/- posts, I’ve received exactly three negative comments and one comment that was nitpicky enough to be borderline.
Being as it’s literary fiction there doesn’t seem to be much going on, but the pace is fast. And by not much going on I mean that it’s normal everyday stuff like decisions on what to say to your husband when he does something annoying and whether or not to accept a job promotion. I certainly don’t mean that the book is boring, because boring it isn’t. I want to know Melody. I hope that she becomes my best friend. I’m intrigued by her story and can’t put it down without thinking about it until I pick it up again.
Kagiso Pooe says the examinations are failing to prepare pupils for life or higher education
70. Knowing that we will be moving into a more suitable home for our family sooner rather than later...
Not enough questions were submitted so I decided not to do it. Honestly that's pretty much what I expected. I am not known to NOT tell people things so what is there left to know? I did want to answer one person's questions however, so here they are:
There’s nothing enlightened about shrinking
cow
it weights around 122g.
Bruce went to see a debt collector today because there are several people who owe us a fair amount on services rendered, and we're just gatvol of telling them to pay, pay, pay and they never do.
Paul Moloney formerly shared a house in Newmarket with former champion Flat jockey Jamie Spencer and was born on October 17, 1978, hailing from New Inn, close to Ballydoyle in Co Tipperary. He was heavily involved in both hunting and show jumping and rode his first point-to-point winner at Quin in 1996 for trainer Danny O’Connell. He spent school holidays with Jim Bolger, working alongside Tony McCoy and leading Flat rider Ted Durcan, and later joined Michael Hourigan, for whom he rode his first three winners. His initial success under Rules came on Vain Princess at Clonmel in June, 1995. Moloney was one of Ireland’s leading amateurs and shared the 1998/99 title with Philip Fenton. Moloney also spent time with Christy Roche while in Ireland. He came to Britain for tuition from Yogi Breisner before turning professional and relocated to Newmarket during the 2002/2003 season when he rode mainly for Ian Williams. He enjoyed big race success at Aintree in 2006 when he rode State Of Play to victory in a handicap chase and teamed up with the same horse to secure the biggest win of his career so far in the Hennessy Cognac Gold Cup Handicap Chase at Newbury in November, 2006. He has finished fourth (2009 and 2011) and third (2010) on the same horse in the John Smith’s Grand National. He rides mainly for State Of Play’s trainer Evan Williams and his biggest wins include Deep Purple’s victory in the 2009 Charlie Hall Chase at Wetherby and Tiger O’Toole’s victory in the Grade Two Holloways Hurdle at Ascot in January, 2011.This season he has taken the decision to get off State Of Play in favour of Cappa Bleu in the John Smith’s Grand National. John Smith’s Grand National Record:2002 Iris Bleu (Fell 5th); 2004 Royal Atalza (PU bef 29th);
Learning to live our priorities actually encompasses all three parts of the Clarity Principle found in Hebrews 12:1-2. Getting rid of extraneous obligations and expectations is one of the ways we “throw off everything that hinders.” Not letting the trivial supersede the vital is an example of how we “run with perseverance the race marked out for us.” And ordering our lives around what God wants is part of how we “fix our eyes on Jesus.”
Faith is not a virtue – It’s a GIFT!
Lunghu thought he was just joking around when he casually remarked last month that Israel wouldn’t be satisfied with bombing Iran –they’d want Jonathan Pollard released from federal prison, too. Some literalist in Tel Aviv must have thought that sounded like a good idea …
Ramsey Campbell – The Ferries
"This just related to what happened to us in 2002 in China when... (we were) obliged to move the women's World Cup from China to the U.S. because it was a question of safety," he told reporters, adding South Africa was meeting its requirements.
This dish is delicious served with rice and egg rolls. For an added touch to the rice, I added about 1/2 tablespoon of soy sauce to the water.
1386 D-V/19/2001. “Gulliver’s Travels and the Problem of Socrates: Can One Ever Go Home Again?” Seminar, Lenoir-Rhyne College Hickory Humanities Forum, Wildacres Conference Center, Little Switzerland, North Carolina.
4) Don't worry, the walls are going to be painted, creamy white on the soon to be, paneled wainscoting below, and a faux grasscloth treatment above in Benjamin Moore's Wythe Blue:
Birthdays do not have to be a bad thing. Getting older can be fun! Here are some tips that can help you survive that dreaded day that we mark the gradual passing of mortality.
Purex Laundry Detergent 50 oz. $1.99
Yesterday afternoon at 12.51pm a devastating earthquake hit Christchurch and outlying areas. I grabbed Sian, the only of the midgets that was at home, and cowered under a doorway, it was hard to run, the ground was very very violent.
The down side of my introduction to Greek olive oil was it spoiled me somewhat, being the best olives / oil I had ever tasted, I now much prefer Olive Oil from Crete on my salads or just dipping.
Cruz has been with the Astros for what seems like forever. I'm too young to know much of his playing days but I remember always seeing him outside the foul lines as the first base coach. I love how he signed the "Cheo" nickname on the 1977 Topps card I gave him. He even included his #25 which was retired by the Astros a nearly 20 years ago.
Bolden continued:
The principled stand against abortion is excellent: human life begins at conception.
My eyes enthralled by you
A slow building bass intro is probably best for the final song on this E.P. It’s a song that is far more chilled than The Exhibition and could easily work as an instrumental track. It’s the song that mostly displays their prog influences and proves their exceptional technical abilities. It’s not as good as Grudge Harbour but it is certainly a fantastic track that backs up claims that Lost Persona are a band that are underestimated and underrated.
Head to your nearest market, grab a cup of coffee, and enjoy the sights and tastes of spring. Connect with your community and go home with some tasty and healthy food for the week ahead. Farmer’s Markets are a wonderful experience for you and your kids and you will be encouraging healthier, seasonal eating for your family!
Noteworthy: Has more hits vs. Brad Radke (29/69, .420 avg) than any other pitcher he's faced.
Child: “Mom, can I get Resident Affronted 5?”
The final goal
Ginger, 3 slices
YIPPEE!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
What was your initial reaction, and how did you celebrate, when you were first accepted for publication? Or when you first saw your debut story in book form on a bookseller’s shelf?
My friend Dani, who also had signed up for the race somewhat on a whim, found me at the start line. She had a previous PR of around 1:57 I believe, but also hadn't completely trained for this race, so she wasn't going in with any time goals. We chatted a bit, I popped a couple of honey stingers, a couple minutes later the national anthem was played, and suddenly it was go time! In the first mile I ended up passing the 1:55 pacer. It was so congested in that area (not surprising), I just had to get out. The first mile flew by, but honestly I think they had the course marked incorrectly for a bit. I knew my GPS was a little off, and we hit the 1 mile marker before it did. The rest of the race my GPS hit the mile markers first.
As the half-finishedness of this landscape suggests, in many ways the modern urban cities closest to Dickens’s London no long belong to Europe, but to Asia and Africa. For better or for worse, cities like Mumbai (where I live) have the same narrative energy. They exist permanently suspended between need and satiation, wakefulness and sleep, impoverished by the city and yet unable to imagine a life outside it, mixing a thousand different tongues and accents into one jumbled-up patois.
Bouncing balls. I do have a pianist in the family, actually, but that was because she wanted to play the piano. And for the record, I admit I did force one year of piano on both of my boys, requiring them to get those piano basics in and learn to read music before choosing another instrument, which they did. David plays bass guitar, and Derek plays the drums. Yeah, my house is not quiet! But besides music, we have had bouncing balls around here forever! Basketball and baseball are the games of choice, with only a slight foray into soccer, one season’s worth, many years ago. I cannot imagine being a Tigger Mother without a ball bouncing, somewhere, at all times!
And that number keeps growing.
3) People tell them its cool
Bronze: Portsmouth Brewery Milk Stout, Portsmouth Brewery, Portsmouth, NH
Cujidatta (coo-ji-da-ta) Italian cookies are what is cooking in the kitchen today. I have promised my dad to make his most beloved Christmas cookie again this year, but they are a pain in the you-know-what!
Hope you are all enjoying this traditional "last hurrah" of summer, though I for one am not letting go of summer just yet! There are so many things I still want to do before the weather gets cooler, so we'll try to squeeze it all in over the next few weeks!
It’s a pity then that on Saturday mornings I miss the amusing but pointless and futile attempts by a small group of beer bloggers to get some beer onto a Saturday morning TV show called Saturday Kitchen. Saturday Kitchen is one of those shows it’s really not worth getting out of bed on a Saturday morning for. There used to be proper shows on a Saturday morning like Going Live which featured the best comedians ever to grace the TV (not including the Chuckle Brothers which are the actual best ever), Trevor & Simon. It is a travesty they are not on TV anymore yelling “We don’t do duvets” at the kids of Britain. Now I would tweet a campaign to bring them back.
Latto says the Ninth Circuit decision means law enforcement can place trackers on cars, without seeking a court’s permission, in the nine western states the California-based circuit covers.
However, if we look at what happened to Ruddles after being taken over by Grand Metropolitan, to Theakstons after going to Matthew Brown and then Scottish & Newcastle, or to Boddingtons after being swallowed up by Whitbread, the precedent of big brewers buying smaller ones for their brand name is not exactly encouraging. It’s not impossible for large corporations to be conscientious stewards of respected “authentic” drinks brands – this has certainly been the case with Scotch malt whisky distilleries. It never seems to happen with beer, though, but let’s hope this time I am proved wrong.
I am going to share a few 'conversation poems' which may (or may not) inspire you. I generally find that the work of other poets inspires me, and maybe this is true for you too.
Who struggled and tried to hide it but ultimately decided to be transparent on this journey, sharing the good and the bad? This sister.
“What happened!?” shouted Hermel to the man. He turned around and it happened to be one of the rough neck men who he’d argued with on their first night at the Inn, but the man did not seem to notice or care about that.
If you take a look at the comparison shot below, you’ll notice that the iPhone 4S makes my food look a little bland. (It’s delicious, in case you’re wondering.) But when I hold both phones up next to the food, the iPhone 4S clearly captured reality way better than the One S.
A really soft and kind of moist sweet bread dough with a egg-white-almond flour-orange peel-cream topping.
Talk about a big splash! An American model measuring 205 cm (she's about 6'9") is set to be featured on the cover of Australian magazine Zoo Weekly.
Sometime while I was with them, Nanny and I would bake. It depended on my mood as to what we cooked. She always baked whatever struck my fancy. She made the best peanut butter cookies. That was one of the first things I learned to bake. Of course we used that teacup to measure the sugar.
Just a day before this, the state’s planning minister was reported as declaring the NSW Farmers Association as irrelevant when considering coal seam gas development.
For the PRINCESS of Las PULGAS BOOK GIVEAWAY, just leave a comment. Easy-peasy!!
3 improve
This is a common attitude toward social media. You see it on LinkedIn among the LIONs (There’s more on that in the What is a LinkedIn LION ™? section) The number of followers on social media is generally not what your business should concentrate on. The quality of your interactions with your community is vastly more important than the quantity.
I later found out that the stranger at the door who was so kind to Liliya, is head of President Sarkozy's bodyguards. She was obviously in good hands...as is President Sarkozy, no doubt.
Allegations of critical lapses at Texas crime labs, including one of the state’s most vaunted facilities, were among a dozen complaints reported to the Texas Forensic Science Commission and made public this week by the fledgling state agency that investigates misconduct by the forensic science community.
concerned. While making this album, they produced tracks
Prefense also has a Silica complex in its formula that actually moisturizes your hands, as opposed to the usual hand sanitizers that dry you out.
The aboriginal Mario 64 relied heavily on the N64′s analog joystick, so Mario 64 DS gives you a few altered ascendancy options that advance to claiming the ascendancy in altered ways. By default, the bold is configured to let you play afterwards appliance the system’s draft screen. The D pad is acclimated for movement, and the buttons are acclimated for jumping, ducking, attacking, and running. While you can aswell use the draft awning for running, the added two ascendancy modes are somewhat bigger ill-fitted for use with the draft screen, absolution you drag the buttons about a bit to accord you added ascendancy over your character. Although the three options do a adapted job of absolution you ascendancy your character, none of them are in actuality as artful as the analog joystick that was acclimated to ascendancy Mario aback in the aboriginal game. The D pad’s agenda attributes makes affective with it rather imprecise. It attempts to achieve up for the abridgement of clarification by accepting a little added momentum-based, but you’ll still acquisition yourself alive off of ledges added about than you’d like. Appliance the draft awning in actuality isn’t abundant better. You’ll accept abounding analog ascendancy over your movement, but alteration admonition isn’t as aqueous as it should be. The ascendancy issues aren’t insurmountable, but it’s a affliction that the bold doesn’t ascendancy as able-bodied as the original. Air-conditioned Mario 64 is a bold that requires a lot of absorption movements, and it’s adverse that none of the attainable ascendancy options are in actuality up to the task.
“Because you know how to sew.”
I give you....
He is telling you something
It is clear even in paragraph 30 of the DOJ’s own complaint that Amazon was engaging in predatory pricing — i.e. by selling e-books at $9.99, Amazon was selling them below cost.
Mastering the secrets of the body language might be complicated. Body language is a visual mode of communication – you cannot learn it just from reading – you need to see it. The Body Language Cards do just that; they flood your consciousness with the visual gestures and connect it to its meaning so you can retain the information and use it in real-time situations.
How do I explain my raunchy behavior, one night stands, confession of possibly being a sex addict and career as a stripper to the one person who tells me to watch my language, preaches the bible and teaches Sunday school every week? I love my mother to death but she is one of the most conservative, close minded women I have ever known.
Some articles and videos describing this model can be found at
In general, I believe that pursuing conspiracy theories is a waste of time – so why do I advocate investigating this one? Because the enemies of freedom are extremely wealthy and extremely powerful. The more we know about them – and the more they are exposed, the better we will be able to deal with it. Shine a flashlight on the rats and they will scatter.
Video Player Integrated
Necklace- Thrifted Savers
Thirty-six hours later I was out of the hospital. One day later I was back to editing.
Forget Mitt and Newt (and how I wish I could). Let's hear it for President Fantasia!
Although there are established health advantages to eating fatty fish, the risks of contaminants can’t be ignored either. All fish, wild or farmed, must adhere to FDA limits for PCB content and mercury levels, but some fish may measure in just below that cutoff. This content can build up in the body over time and cause problems later. However, many scientists believe that the heart-healthy benefits of consuming fish outweigh the risk, especially for older adults who may have already had a heart attack. But younger consumers, especially woman who may become pregnant and have a lifetime of exposure to these pollutants ahead of them, may wish to limit the amount of farmed fish they eat.
When I asked my friend Amy to take photos of H's 5th birthday party I knew she'd do a great job, but I wasn't prepared for just how beautifully she'd capture all the special moments that made up that great day. There's just so much to share and tell, so I'll jump right back in.
I still seem to be very tired, probably overworked, with a sudden onset of the munchies.
(The rules for the regular Sunday Challenge are all still the same)
While they were out I was in church. I was playing the music today, but felt the songs weren't really suited to the organ so played them on the clarinet. We've recently updated the sound system and, for the first time, I was amplified. Sounded quite good from where I was standing, I rather hope I might be asked to do that again sometime. I like playing the clarinet and I like playing the piano (although to a very poor standard nowadays) but I have never been an accomplished organist and I rarely enjoy it.
UP THERE!
I'm lucky to get Jaipur in my local Tesco Express, the smallest Tesco in the area, on the route home from work. No longer must I settle for anything else during that mad rush home on a Friday, I can nip in and buy one of my favourite beers almost on my doorstep!
On the other hand, a "composite"? Could you make a composite of two or three people you cared about deeply? Wouldn't it rather be the case that you can't help but see such people as the individuals that they are?
1 accretion
department who wrote a memo to the Management denouncing the
So the question remains: is this a good thing? Well, I do recall a point in the first couple of seasons when everyone had sold their soul at least once, and had had revelations about members of their family at least half a dozen times. I could feel interest and creativity waning in the family angst of the main characters, since they had thoroughly discussed their issues on a near-weekly basis. The further expansion of the world and crises was not only inevitable, but also necessary for the continuation of the series. Had the show ended when Dean went to hell, or when John died, then to limit it to the family would have been enough. As it is, though, they had to begin to deal with the larger world outside of the ‘monster of the week’ episodes.
Woodend.
It all started with finding a drapery panel in this fabric:
Cricut Head, scrapbook sayings -Cricut Everyday
but my favorite part is that you always take a second after the punch line to ponder it,
Now, if that sounds to you like a religious statement, I completely understand. So did I, until recently.
My assessment is that it's even money, if not more likely, that we'll
My poor plants that I have started indoors are more than ready to be put into the garden. My Yellow Squash and Cucumber plants have already started to flower. This week we had two frosty mornings. Yesterday the daytime high was in the 80's with a nighttime low in the 60's. I am hoping that I can start getting these babies into the ground.
Coaches are constantly searching for answers to how they can make their trainees stronger. Some use a mixture reps and sets, some use percentage based loads and others stick to heavy, high intensity sessions. One thing is certain; using light loads for high repetitions will not get your athlete stronger. They may be able lift the lightweight twenty, thirty or more times, but when the weights start pilling on the bar, they are unable to move the load.
Before I had kids I didn’t believe in TV, unhealthy foods, my kid would be potty trained prior to two. Whatever.
One way to make sure you aren’t running away from your problems is to notice whether you are moving towards something that is exciting in its own right, as opposed to something that is appealing only because it is not where you are now. For example, if you are leaving a city because you feel you can’t afford it, you could be reinforcing poverty consciousness, and you might find that you are unable to make ends meet in your new city as well. It would ultimately be less of an effort to stay where you are and look more deeply into your beliefs about money. You may discover that as you address these issues, you are able to make more money simply by changing your mindset. You may still decide to move, but it will be an act with a positive intention behind it and not an escape, which could make all the difference.
Me: Thanks Ron for all of your help but, I’m going to stick with the phone that I have.
The mustard I boiled in salt water and then froze some. To prepare, I sauteed in butter with some garlic and then added a little lemon juice. They were very good. You pick them just before the flower buds open up. Yummmy!!!
The doctor leaves and returns promptly with the nice woman who weighed me. They lower the table that’s mounted to the wall. Then they lift me onto it. I start to panic. They pin me down on my side and hold my legs.
I will always honor and love you.
Word searches make me feel unreasonably skilled.
Two lucky winners will each get a coupon good for a FREE bottle of Torani syrup. Yes, just a coupon. You didn't think I'd send you a bottle in the mail, did you? With the outrageous shipping prices going on these days??
Even if Christianity was the only true religion, the fact that it has been divided into thousands of competing sects, despite the fact that Christians are supposed to believe in one God and one savior, is enough to show that there are no “true” Christians. No matter what position you take, you are part of a minority in the world; Christians only make up about 1/4 of the population of the world. Is it logical to assume that God would condemn the vast majority of the world for not being Christian, especially when there is so much evidence that it is defended by outright fraud?
With 3 months to go, there are a few reasons for the extension of my list, namely that grad school takes up an obscene amount of my life and that being gone all summer kept me from doing things like horseback riding, ballpark visiting and movie watching. I'm ok with it though.
Shake This Feelin' by The Liquid Vapours
But with a conservative titular head of the party? Not as much money.
While Tertia interrupts the tale
I want to live my life with purpose and intention. I will live my life with the purposeful intention of blessing others. I will live my life with passion.
OK!! Now that my mind's partially cleared, its time for me to 'show-off' my
CULTURE / MUSEUM
Who suffered for our salvation: descended into hell, rose again the third day from the dead.
We never travel with a car seat. For all the times coming to Jamaica with the boys, we never brought it along. The one time my wife, Wendy, convinced me to bring it, this happens. And to think how frustrated and obstinate I had been about
"Thus says the Lord of hosts, 'I will punish Amalek for what he did to Israel, how he set himself against him on the way while he was coming up from Egypt.
RECOMMENDATION: Fantasy lovers should see this. It’s one of the better fantasy movies of the 1980s. It’s along the same lines as Legend, Labyrinth, and the The Dark Crystal.
Often a photograph or painting doesn’t turn out the way we envision and if we’re perfectionists, a hard earned piece can be easily tossed out and redone. For a painter this could mean weeks or months of painting, and for a photographer it could mean serious expenditures of time and finances. Often we’re simply busy.
It was just me and the girls this time, but we had a great time.
So excited! They're here! Live in Person!!!
Peter D. Kelly –Hard Road. Not the Vanda & Young tune as I expected
In our second segment, we talked about different scenarios for deflection and the cost of deflection compared to the cost of an evacuation of people from the impact zone. Rusty talked about knowing the impact zone and why we can evaluate this much further in advance of impact than when working with space debris. A listener asked about using a nuclear bomb in space for mitigation. Rusty took us through the nuclear analysis and when as a last resort, a nuke might be needed. In this analysis, he again went over the kinetic impact and then talked about the gravity tractor concept which he said was slow but very precise. In his analysis, he used an interesting analogy to baseball, pitching the fastball, & the point at which the batter must act given the speed of the ball. Don’t miss it. We talked more on telescopes and he mentioned the University of Hawaii ATLAS project (www.fallingstar.com). Another important point discussed in this segment was the fact that NASA has no official responsibility to protect us from a hit. We talked about the consequences of this policy, changing the policy to officially give NASA this responsibility, and funding it through the budget process. During our discussion, Rust outlined several steps that listeners could take if interested in this issue. Rusty offered specific recommendations all of us could do that would be beneficial to planetary defense.
Do you see him across the little pond in someone's back yard?
She paddles her white canoe.
Guilt pokes at me when my eyes rest on the baby basket, or when I open the baby drawer to toss in something new.
He talked about crime writers he admired - including Val McDermid and Mark Billingham (and, incidentally, said that he thought Mark had done well to get out of the playground titles (Scaredy Cat and Sleepy Head) before he was reduced to Specky Four Eyes and Smelly Bum). This then led to him to worrying about Sue Grafton who must have thought that A Is For Alibi was a good idea until she got to K is For Kicking The Arse Out Of It. He wondered how she feels as she gets close to having to write a mystery where an important plot point has to revolve around a xylophone).
It was over in less than ten.
You wouldn’t have bouncin’ boobies if you don’t have music! Opening the TOR show on Thursday night was the fabulous Los Shimmy Shakers. Unfortunately this was also the last gig for their bass player (auditions going on now). Also an awesome guest vocalist was Scott Holderby. Not sure who shook the stage more….the gogo dancer or himself. It was a shame that he only graced the stage for a song.
New Order True faith UK
The 127,000 word manuscript is completed and ready to be sent at your request. Thank you for taking the time to consider my work.
“You should have gone in yourself. The water was lovely. Thanks,” he said, taking the towel. He started to rub himself down vigorously, starting with his head.
Cause that is exactly what went thru my mind when I found this website.
What else? I’ve watched Game of Thrones. Just keeps getting better. I wish someone would kill Joffrey, that little sadist annoys me greatly but I have a feeling he won’t be punished anytime soon.
Shauni and I are so excited to get started but we think it will be best to wait until after Thanksgiving to give everybody a chance to spend time with their families. So, check us out after Thanksgiving (probably the beginning of December) for the beginning of the PARTAY!
11Hide it, my heart, within that close disguise,
But. Anyway.
Back to Sage's, the food is always thoughtfully prepared and delicious. They have a gluten-free options menu, too. Definitely try the weekend brunch. I'm a fan of "The Mountain."
02.Purulence Flesh Murderer (04:00)
30. Marconi's First Transmission From Weston
You have to always protect the food. Whether it's still on the stove top, on the counter, island, or in our plates....you must always protect your food because girlfriend can jump ANYWHERE!
Quest Level: 1+
Us KIDS.
Excellent… I really must buy some more Highgrove lemon curd, and a few of those weird biscuits he makes when he isn’t being Prince Charles, to help him become more carbon neutral. Mind, you.. I am desperately worried about my carbon footprint from 1st July when I take my portable heater with me, wherever I go, to keep myself warm while I smoke outside.
A 1kg box of powdered sugar / icing sugar. - expect to use around 600g at least
Majerus’s experiment was one-sided: that is, he released both types of moths at their naturally-occurring frequencies (a good design) in only unpolluted woods, for polluted woods aren’t around in Britain any longer. Nevertheless, it’s still a decent test of the bird-predation hypothesis, which under Majerus’s conditions predicted that relatively more of the dark moths than of the light moths would be eaten.
Beer: Nature's laxative.
Four years ago, as we realized the time was very near, a couple of my brothers and I talked about it and I said I would do the eulogy. I asked everyone to send me something they wanted to say and somehow the eulogy wrote itself. I understand now that its because my mom lived how she wanted to be remembered.
For those of you that prefer to make our own pie crust …. like me, rather than using a frozen store bought, here is one that’s ideal dough recipe for Quiches, Sweet and Savory Pies! It is a no fail recipe, so if it is your first time making this dough you should have no problem.
At Celebrity Optimist, we shift the focus from the negative to the positive things celebrities do with their platforms.
The media was first absent then forgiving to candidate Barack Hussein Obama when the flag of Che Guevara, an Argentine Marxist revolutionary was hanging in plain view on the wall of one of Obama’s campaign offices in early 2008. They were equally forgiving about the ornament that featured the portrait of Mao Tse-tung hanging on the 2009 White House Christmas Tree. It appeared that few understood the implications represented by that image alone, and the “change” that was intended for the U.S.
I parctise every day several different pieces with my flute. I play mostly classical music and I really love baroque music. So now I have very little time to make backgrounds, but I won't quit it, you get new backgrounds every now and then.
Put the popcorn, peanuts and M&Ms in a large bowl. In another bowl, melt the wafers/discs and peanut butter together in microwave. (I microwave for 1 minute and stir. Then micro for 30 seconds at a time, stirring after each 30-second interval, until melted.)
I think I’ll leave it there for now, but before I do, I would just like to say a big, big thank you to every single one of you for taking the time to read, rate, comment and subscribe to my poetry and blog. It means more to me than I can possibly express; you all keep me writing and I look forward to it each day. If you have any burning questions, thoughts, etc. you’d like to mention, please leave me a comment below! It’s always lovely chatting to you all.
I couldn’t do something that would improve the economy because the economy was in a bad shape.
05 Jumping Jesus
6. ELIMINATE DISTRACTIONS.
Update 'Books Received in 2012' page
Style: 8
"They're not as good as fresh," her mom replied. "But I don't have time to do that. Maybe if I got more help around here."
September 2011
I will never let go
202Not touch'd, but rapt; not waken'd, but inspir'd!
On Jack's birthday we had only lived here for less than 48 hours and we also baptized Nathan that day. I was worried because I didn't want Nathan's birthday to overshadow Jack's birthday but Jack was unconcerned and still had a great day. After the baptism we went to a park nearby and had a party with both sets of great grandparents, both sets of grandparents and all sorts of uncles and one of the Aunt Natalies and cousin Daniel. Jack was a happy camper.
.... I told Cyle I'd post a recent picture of him with this school rant, which he gave me permission to put up, even though he hesitated because of the grammar and spelling stuff.
...so, everyone is gaga about Reality TV and I don't even watch it - mainly because I don't have cable, thank goodness. As I drove the kids to Ecole this morning...I pitched this series in my mind:
However, the references are not the whole story, not by a mile. This sculpture grows long in the mind—the figures are alien, not of this earth, somehow gleaming yellow and a Michelin Man yet not a cartoon. It is an odd, burrowing piece of sculptural intelligence that not only transcends its associations but gives you a sense that you are seeing something from around the corner or from across the universe. There’s a spirit and an energy that doesn’t merely come from enthusiasm (which Houseago has in spades) or from historical friction but from oddity, uniqueness, from a place that Schütte has access to but I do not.
No sin can stand-all torment ends
Have a great week!!
dune only to find more dunes, which seem to go on forever.
When I first thought of this post I was in a rage. Imagine that. This post has been coming for while. I don't know if it will help or enlighten any of the offenders but I hope so. I hope that until you read this you had no clue what you were doing or saying and I hope you will think next time you speak.
"Well, Emily has one and it's just wonderful. She has five friends. Five! Three girls and two boys. She's very social."
07. I Knew Gg When He Was A Wimp
Here is the DIY for Beach Hair Spray I mentioned in the video:
I've been AWOL. Sorry, my allergies are killer.
For the most part I ignore the bad and praise the good. I ride through the small bucks and crow hops and back legs kicking out. I ride through the head shaking and spooks. When we are heading for complete meltdown though, I circle. When he stops, the head goes up and and shakes and he starts jackhammering with all 4 legs I pull his head to my leg and circle. It works for me. It allows him to keep moving but keeps him on the ground. Usually he stops on his own, I release, pause for a few moments to regroup, and then continue on in whichever gait we were in before meltdown. I'm pretty sure I would be criticized for this by many people except cowboys... but I feel like it keeps me from getting into battles with him.
The Los Angeles Times, in the grand tradition of biased, left wing urban newspapers has 'distinguished' itself yet again.
So, in the next week or two expect to see a handful of posts that will hopefully be up to the standard I expect of myself.
The elections last night were effectively a hurricane ripping through the LibDems support, knocking down the weak but leaving the strong in place. As in nature, a disaster is often part of a natural cycle. These results blew away the leftist/anti establishment supporters and left the truly centrist supporters intact. I don't believe the LibDems can ever get the old supporters back fully and certainly not without destroying any credibility they will gain from seeing through the agenda of economic and social reform they are now committed to in the coalition.
Without me
Gav went for the chocolate slice (£7.50) which was another triumph. Thick, dense, rich chocolate served with soured cream and dates was beautiful. Again the flavour combinations were spot on a mouthful of all three elements was a delight, although the chocolate slice on its own would have been a more than sufficient dessert.
On one side of the island would be all the houses and on the other would be a supermarket of some kind. Probably a Sainsbury's since these fruits like to be organic. Between the houses and the supermarket would be one link road - 20 miles in length. Of course none of them are allowed cars or anything else that requires any energy to build so that puts bikes out of the question as well. They'd have their trafficless utopia which they'd all hate and I'd get my roads back without stupid speed limits and traffic calming measures clogging them up.
A person in church seemed to think because I was married I didn't need to worry about money and a satisfying job, at least that was the impression I went away with Grrr! I believe that God created me as a person with gifts and part of my responsibility is not to bury those gifts (or hide behind my husband) but rather that I need to fan those gifts to live to my fullest potential! Yes, I agree that we do not hold in highest regard the almighty dollar but there is no doubt that it is difficult (or almost impossible at times) not to equate our worth with our pay check. Thankfully I do not have live on my pay check or I would be homeless!
It was a 2-day sail from Moorea to the Tuamotu atolls/islands. We were fortunate that we were able to sail most of the way, but it was a lumpy, noisy trip because the seas were a little confused and Moondance was rocking around. So, not much sleep!
The gender balance among presenters, like that in the field of Communist history studies generally, anachronistically reproduced that of workers’ congresses a century ago.
Publication didn’t come easy. Once I realized how hard getting a book published would be I focused on writing magazine articles. The publication of a book eluded me for many years.
When I promoted the event I made two guarantees.
And I give you good news by word of mouth
Sonic Youth are known as sort-of tonal mad scientists, a rock band on the fringe of dissolution into noise, an outfit prone to sudden bouts of amplifier feedback ritual and worship. Blixa Bargeld of Einstürzende Neubauten fame would praise their unique and heretic approach to their own music and their musical instruments (tens of busted up and experimented upon guitars kept in cardboard boxes all over the stage, like so many broken furniture parts) as he was deciding to leave Nick Cave and The Bad Seeds on account of Nick’s heroine fever-dream music being just a little bit too mainstream back in the early nineties. Kurt Cobain used to idolize them and covered one of their songs with Nirvana. That’s how much of an impression Sonic Youth leave, while somehow managing to stay in the shadows of the industry, thoroughly askew in their abrasive sound armor plating, merely flirting with pop sensibility on some albums and completely smashing it against the wall in others.
Aarti’s character seems to be so shallow, with nothing going for her other than her beauty, that it makes you wonder what made both Gopal and Raghav fall for her in the first place. Raghav seems to be living under the impression that an impoverished journalist can single-handedly bring about a social revolution. Gopal, on the other hand, is incredibly self-obsessed and immature throughout the book, and sometimes you wish he would have just died so we didn’t have to listen to his awful story.
4. Tomorrow When the War Began by John Marsden.
I'm not sure I'm sold on the maxi-dress thing. I got this one this morning (50% off at value village today) and the fit and pattern are good but that long length still gets me. I might hem it. I thought I'd take some pictures first; don't want to rush into such commitment yet. I had a much more majestic area planned to take these photos but on my way I was attacked my mosquitos the size of minivans. I had to run home and spray myself down then attempt to go out again. I didn't make it as far... backyard will have to do.
Make sure your story is finished. Do it justice and PLEASE don’t send something half-done in just to make a deadline. You’re competing with good, and often, professional writers, so a half-finished story a) won’t stand a chance of winning b) will waste a reader’s time and c) will waste your time – don’t forget, while you’re waiting for that short list to be announced you could be finishing it, making it awesome, and sending it somewhere else.
When fifteen years old I was bitten in the hand by a mad dog in the last stages of hydrophobia. However, he did not draw blood, and through the mercy and power of God I was again preserved from an awful death.”
An example of a country which has been dedicated to ancestral spirits is Haiti. As the Wall Street Journal noted in its article: "Haiti and the Voodoo Curse: The Cultural Roots of the Country's Endless Misery", that despite Haiti having received billions of dollars in foreign aid over the last 50 years, it remains the least developed country in the Western hemisphere. Haiti has defied all development predictions. Operation World reports that Haiti is the poorest state in the Western hemisphere with over 75% of the population living on less than $2 a day. Effective unemployment is around 70%. 98% of the island is deforested. Haiti has some of the worst pollution, drought, famine, rapid rise of drug abuse and spread of AIDS in the Western hemisphere. An estimated 75% of the population are actively involved in voodoo. Haiti is at the top of the corruption index. A full 25% of the police are in the pay of drug lords and gangs. The massive earthquake in 2010 was one of the worst natural disasters to ever hit the Western hemisphere, with over 300,000 dead. At its inception in 1803, Haiti was dedicated to satan. In 2003, voodoo was declared a national religion of Haiti.
“Why?”After a long silent, he asks. “You never treated nicely?”
B.A. Programme
Ally and I are finally starting to talk travel plans now that the Madrid course map has finally been posted.
still, i have to admit. i'm P.O.O.P.E.D!
Up this week over at Clutch:
The magi had a special experience. They had the star that led them to Israel, but they did not have the scriptures. The magi had a revelation, but not the necessary knowledge. They saw the star, but they didn’t know where to go.
Okay I'm crying just at writing your name. Your presents in my life and such a vital time in my adolescents was never by mistake. I strongly believe God placed you in my life at such a time as I was finding who I was and who I wanted to be. While attending FGSHS in grade ten I struggled to find myself. It was while on a Christian Camp that you and I found each other. A few weeks later I was sitting in your lounge room meeting your wonderful husband and some of your most treasured friends. It was then and there that I wanted what you had. A beautiful home, a loving/soulful husband, lifelong friends and most of all a heart for Christ. I took everything you ever taught me and pinned them onto my heart. While in foster homes, youth shelters and on the streets it was the things I was taught of God's love that got me through and kept me strong. Katherine, you believed in me long after everyone else gave up on me. You'd call me while I was homeless just to say hi and to tell me you loved me. That in itself is Jesus. Thank you!
I think the reason why it has grown so attached to viewers is because everyone can simply “relate” and “identify” themselves with the characters. Each episode just feels so real, not pretentious and never over-the-top. Most of all (especially if you have been around since season 1), you’ll know how the characters have developed into who they’re supposed to be, how each story has happened, and how each has brought spark to another – all the while, building such a wonderful bond with each other. And those are just a few of the many reasons why we love OTH.
Today was another pretty special day.....I went on a helicopter ride with my nephew. There was a place, not too far from me, that was offering helicopter rides ...it was 12 minutes long. It was beautiful, such a different experience than a plane thats for sure...10000 times better!! As for tonight...I am staying in...I am exhausted, I want to read a bit, and relax
The town Resolution was an unfinished town but soon be built after Cole and Hitch blazed a path for it.
The flight from Manchester to CLE was interesting, inasmuch as the only times I've flown in planes smaller than that Embraer 145, I was wearing a headset and sitting in the right seat.
Philip Seymour Hoffman (Magnolia, The Talented Mr. Ripley)
There have been 150 species of medicinal mushrooms found to inhibit the growth of different typs of tumors, especially cancers of the stomach, esophagus, and lungs, but Chaga seems to stand out from the rest. I learned about this mushroom from herbalist David Winston, who told me it has been used traditionally to treat different forms of cancer in Siberia, Canada, Scandinavia, the United States, and Russia.
Trumpet Voluntary (J. Clarke)
1 tbsp coriander, ground
Eh? You what, love?
I walked out of the bathroom and back into the blinding brightness of the main hall, and I couldn't help but wonder: What was she doing in there, having a baby?
Nina also enjoyed it, as she got to eat the gooey bits that he dropped on the floor. She will henceforth be in charge of cleaning those gooey bits up before I step on them and they squish between my toes. Eeeeeew.
or I am forever spoiled for love,
and rightly so as he is almost always super busy with work.
Can't get enough of this hand writing!!!! I wouldn't print entire books like that but a poster or a zine... Absolutely loving it!!
I enjoyed this show from the start, but since the show has come back for the winter it has really hit its stride. They’re no longer focusing on the phony romance interest between Jeff and Britta, which wasn’t believable or interesting. Rather, they have an excellent supporting cast and they’re all being put to great use. This has been a really pleasant surprise. And Community is definitely one of our must-watch shows.
Our souls would seek relief,
Dia - When I was a kid, I never read books about black kids. When I wrote my own short stories, all the characters were white. No one told me they had to be; that was a conclusion I drew based on the evidence at hand, namely, none of my favorite books had anything but white characters. When I got to high school, however, I started reading Octavia E. Butler who not only was black but wrote sf/horror novels about black people. That blew me away. Not long after that, I wrote a story starring a black girl, and I remember feeling guilty, like I was doing something really naughty. Then I realized how much fun being naughty is. I haven't looked back since.
Again, you’d find many street artists — should I call them plaza artists? — around the statues of King Philip III and the corners of the square. Many dining outlets too — mainly catering to the tourist crowd, I guess, judging by their patrons. You can have your paella and jamon fix in any of the tascas here. (Tascas mean “local gathering place”) Or you may simply have that sangria or cafe con leche with some tapas (appetizers) in any of the open-air bars and just people-watch. Buen provecho!
Specifically, I guzzled the green concoction about DeSean Jackson being declared inactive for Sunday afternoon's game against the Arizona Cardinals, and how others would benefit: namely Jason Avant and Brent Celek. Immediately, I placed them in starting positions alongside quarterback Michael Vick. I mean, I had Tim Tebow on the bench. I couldn't have a prayer with him, could I? It's like he has some kind of inside track with God, right?
Now Maya and her friends have been forced to flee from their homes during a forest fire they suspect was deliberately set. Then they're kidnapped, and after a chilling helicopter crash, they find themselves in the Vancouver Island wilderness with nothing but their extraordinary abilities to help them get back home.
- I feel like I’m really hitting my stride with this parenthood thing. It’s the hardest job I’ve ever had, but I think that B is thriving and R and I are strong and connected. B changes everyday. Last week, he decided that bedtime should be around 8pm every evening, so we’ve been enjoying the transition of having an actual evening to ourselves. He’s usually up twice in the night to eat, but he’s so damn sleepy and cuddly that I actually find myself waking up before him in the night, listening for his cues so that we can snug together. He has a new lovey, lapinos the french bunny (featured in the photo below). We think he’s likely teething, as he wants to munch on e.v.e.r.y.t.h.i.n.g and he drools like a mastiff puppy. He can sit up with only the slightest parental support. He will not let us wean him from his night swaddler yet, so we’ve stopped trying for the time being.
Actual OG: 1.077
Jerry Lundegaard (William H. Macy) has a lot of money-making schemes. Parking lot plans to a planned kidnapping of his own wife. They sound okay on paper, but he has a talent for mucking it all up. His wife is kidnapped, the kidnappers mess up and kill three people on their way, and now they want all the money and more of it. Jerry only seems to care about getting the money however so goes about looking for a way to get something out of it, so it’s up to the pregnant police chief Marge Gunderson (Frances McDormand) to sort it all out. Three sets of characters all hoping for something out of this in the snowy Minneapolis.
Every day J leaves our home at 6:30am
It’s super stupid because you have this guy finding this photograph. A ridiculous setup that needs you to really believe in fate for him to jump through as many hoops as he needs in order to meet a girl to fall in love with. But fair enough, you can believe that he really was set on finding the girl in the photo. Once he gets there, however, everything about the photograph is forgotten, he must keep the secret of what led him to her from Beth, until of course the movie needs a schmaltzy climax and the topic must be picked up again like it had never been forgotten in the first place.
Jump Race Record: Starts: 40; 1st: 11; 2nd: 6; 3rd: 8; Prize Money: £210, 002
Yes, this is one of the biggest problems I face in governance
Days just don't get any better than today. They really don't.
